Zum Inhalt wechseln
Datenschutzerklärung TOM Webseite
Innovation 6 AG, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Schweiz, eingetragen im Handelsregister des Kantons
Zürich
unter der Nummer CHE-263.807.653 (
Innovation 6
oder
wir
) ist die Betreiberin
der
Webseite www.tommedications.com (
Webseite
) und stellt auch die Medikamenten-Management-App TOM
(
TOM
) bereit. Innovation 6 ist die Verantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen
Daten
der Webseite und von TOM.
Für die einfachere Lesbarkeit verwenden wir nachfolgend jeweils nur die männliche Bezeichnung, meinen damit aber
Personen aller Geschlechter.
Der ordnungsgemässe Umgang mit den personenbezogenen Daten des Nutzers unserer Webseite und von TOM
(
Nutzer
oder
Sie
) ist Innovation 6 ein besonderes Anliegen. Selbstverständlich
beachten wir, soweit diese anwendbar sind, die Bestimmungen des schweizerischen Bundesgesetzes über den
Datenschutz
(DSG), der schweizerischen Verordnung über den Datenschutz (DSV) und der EU-Datenschutzgrundverordnung (DSGVO)
sowie
weitere gegebenenfalls anwendbare datenschutzrechtliche Bestimmungen. Aufgrund der breiteren räumlichen
Anwendung
werden im Folgenden die Begriffe der DSGVO verwendet werden. Insbesondere werden anstelle der im DSG verwendeten
Begriffe „Bearbeitung“ von „Personendaten“ und “überwiegendes Interesse” die in der DSGVO verwendeten Begriffe
„Verarbeitung“ von „personenbezogenen Daten“ sowie “berechtigtes Interesse” verwendet. Die gesetzliche Bedeutung
der
Begriffe wird jedoch im Rahmen der Geltung des DSG weiterhin nach dem DSG bestimmt.
Im Folgenden informieren wir Sie über die Art, den Umfang und den Zweck der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen
Daten beim Besuch unserer Webseite. Die Datenschutzerklärung von TOM finden Sie hier
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung/
.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass die nachfolgenden Ausführungen von Zeit zu Zeit durch die Veröffentlichung einer
geänderten
Version dieser Datenschutzerklärung angepasst werden können. Diese Datenschutzerklärung wurde zuletzt am 23.
November 2023 geändert.
1. Erhobene Daten, Zweck der Erhebung und Nutzung der Daten
1.1. Automatisch erhobene Daten beim Besuch unserer Webseite
Beim Besuch unserer Webseite werden automatisch folgende Daten erhoben:
Daten zu Netzwerkverbindungen und Webseiten-Aktivitäten (z.B. IP-Adresse, Name und URL der angeforderten Datei,
Hostname des zugreifenden Rechners, Datum und Uhrzeit des Zugriffs).
Geräteinformationen zum benutzten Endgerät (z.B. Hersteller, Model, Plattform, Betriebssystem).
Regions- oder Spracheinstellungen.
Die Verarbeitung dieser Daten ist aus technischen Gründen für die Nutzung unserer Webseite notwendig. Sie
gewährleistet insbesondere den ordnungsgemässen Betrieb und optimiert die Funktionalität und Anzeigequalität der
Webseite. Zudem werden diese Daten für interne statistische Auswertungen zum Nutzerverhalten verwendet. Die
Verarbeitung ist zur Wahrung der berechtigten Interessen von Innovation 6 erforderlich (Rechtsgrundlage: Art. 6
Abs.
1 lit. f DSGVO).
1.2 Cookies
Wir nutzen zudem Cookies, um Ihren Besuch auf unserer Webseite einfacher und angenehmer zu gestalten (vgl. auch
Ziff.1.6). Cookies sind Textdateien, die Ihr Webbrowser automatisch auf Ihrem Endgerät speichert, wenn Sie
unsere
Webseite besuchen. Es werden Session-Cookies verwendet, die nach jedem Besuch unserer Webseite wieder gelöscht
werden, oder auch dauerhafte Cookies, die nach Beendigung der Browser-Sitzung für eine bestimmte Dauer
gespeichert
werden und zur Wiedererkennung des Nutzers dienen. Falls dies rechtlich notwendig ist, holen wir Ihre vorherige
Zustimmung zur Nutzung von Cookies ein (Rechtsgrundlage: Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a und f DSGVO).
Sie können durch entsprechende Konfigurierung Ihres Webbrowsers verhindern, dass Cookies auf Ihrem Endgerät
gespeichert werden. Dies kann allerdings dazu führen, dass Sie nicht alle Funktionalitäten unserer Webseite
nutzen
können.
Auf unserer Webseite nutzen wir die folgenden Cookies:
_ga
Cookie Anbieter: Google Analytics
Lebensdauer: 2 Jahre
Funktion: Google Analytics setzt dieses Cookie zur eindeutigen Identifikation der Nutzer.
_gid
Cookie Anbieter: Google Analytics
Lebensdauer: 24 Stunden
Funktion: Google Analytics setzt dieses Cookie zur eindeutigen Identifikation der Nutzer.
_gat
Cookie Anbieter: Google Analytics
Lebensdauer: 1 Minute
Funktion: Dieses Cookie wird gesetzt, um die Anzahl von Anfragen an Google-Server innerhalb einer bestimmten Zeit
zu
begrenzen.
wp-wpml_current_language
Cookie Anbieter: tom medications
Lebensdauer: 1 Tag
Funktion: Dieser Cookie dienst der Speicherung der Spracheinstellung.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Cookie Anbieter: YouTube
Lebensdauer: 6 Monate
Funktion: Um Anzeigenschaltung oder Retargeting zu ermöglichen, die Identität eines Besuchers und Interaktionen
zu
speichern und zu verfolgen.
YSC
Cookie Anbieter: YouTube
Lebensdauer: Session
Funktion: Um Interaktionen zu speichern und zu verfolgen.
511
Cookie Anbieter: Google
Lebensdauer: 6 Monate
Funktion: Dienst der Authentifizierung.
AEC
Cookie Anbieter: Google
Lebensdauer: 6 Monate
Funktion: Das Cookie stellt sicher, dass die Anfragen innerhalb einer Browsersitzung vom Nutzer und nicht von
anderen
Websites gestellt werden.
SOCS
Cookie Anbieter: Google
Lebensdauer: 30 Tage
Funktion: Dient der Speicherung der Cookie Entscheidungen.
CONSENT
Cookie Anbieter: Google
Lebensdauer: 1 Jahr
Funktion: Dient der Speicherung der Cookie Entscheidungen.
c
Cookie Anbieter: LinkedIn
Lebensdauer: 6 Monate
Funktion: Dient zur Authentifizierung und Tracking.
bcookie
Cookie Anbieter: LinkedIn
Lebensdauer: 1 Jahr
Funktion: Dieses der Browser-Identifizierung dienende Cookie wird für Diagnosezwecke verwendet.
li_sugr
Cookie Anbieter: LinkedIn
Lebensdauer: 3 Monate
Funktion: Mit diesem Cookie werden wahrscheinlichkeitstheoretische Übereinstimmungen der Identität eines Nutzers
außerhalb der designierten Länder festgestellt.
AnalyticsSyncHistory
Cookie Anbieter: LinkedIn
Lebensdauer: 1 Monat
Funktion: Mit diesem Cookie wird gespeichert, wann eine Synchronisierung mit dem Cookie „lms_analytics cookie“
stattgefunden hat.
UserMatchHistory
Cookie Anbieter: LinkedIn
Lebensdauer: 1 Monat
Funktion: Mit diesem Cookie werden die IDs von LinkedIn Ads synchronisiert.
lidc
Cookie Anbieter: LinkedIn
Lebensdauer: 1 Tag
Funktion: Dieses Cookie sorgt für die die Auswahl des Datenzentrums.
1.3 Nutzung des Kontaktformulars
Falls Sie uns mittels Kontaktformular auf unserer Webseite kontaktieren, erheben wir folgende Daten:
Vor- und Nachname (Firmen E-Mail)
E-Mail Adresse
Telefonnummer
Ihre Nachricht
Diese Daten werden von uns genutzt, um Ihre Anliegen zu bearbeiten und Ihre Anfrage zu beantworten
(Rechtsgrundlage:
Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO).
1.4 Medikamenten-Eingabe-Möglichkeit
Auf unserer Webseite besteht die Möglichkeit, den Medikamentenplan sowie die tägliche Dosierung und den
Einnahmezeitpunkt dieser Medikamente zu erfassen. Zu Ihrer Unterstützung stehen verschiedene länderspezifische
Medikamentendatenbanken zur Verfügung, welche die Erkennung der Medikamente erleichtern sollen. Zur Erkennung
der
anwendbaren Medikamentendatenbank bzw. des anwendbaren Landes wird die Regions- und Spracheinstellung Ihres
Webbrowsers und im Falle von Problemen die IP-Adresse verwendet (Rechtsgrundlage: Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO).
Die von Ihnen erfassten Angaben können Sie an TOM übertragen, indem Sie den auf der Webseite angezeigten QR-Code,
in
welchem Ihre Angaben digital codiert sind, mit TOM scannen. Der QR-Code enthält keinen Tracking-Mechanismus.
Falls
Sie TOM noch nicht nutzen, müssen Sie TOM vorgängig auf Ihrem Mobilgerät installieren. Für die Informationen zur
Erfassung und Verwendung Ihrer Daten in TOM verweisen wir auf die Datenschutzerklärung von TOM.
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung/
Nach der Übertragung der Angaben an TOM oder falls Sie sich entschliessen, die eingegebenen Informationen nicht
an
TOM zu übertragen, werden sowohl diese als auch der QR-Code auf der Webseite gelöscht. Auf unserer Webseite
erfolgt
keine Speicherung oder Archivierung dieser Informationen.
1.5 Aufruf eingebundener externer Links
Durch die auf unserer Webseite eingebundenen externen Links werden Sie auf die Webseite von Dritten (z.B. Google
Play
Store, Apple App Store, soziale Netzwerke, Instant-Messaging-Diensten wie WhatsApp oder Telegram)
weitergeleitet.
Innovation 6 hat keinen Einfluss auf die erhobenen Daten und die Datenverarbeitungsvorgänge dieser Dritten und
ist
dafür nicht verantwortlich. Informieren Sie sich bitte dort über den Umgang mit Ihren Daten.
1.6 Analysetool
Unsere Webseite verwendet den Analyse-Dienst Google Analytics (GA4). Die Analysen zur Nutzung unserer Webseite
dienen
der Stabilisierung und Verbesserung unserer Webseite und der Erstellung von Absturzberichten. Die Nutzung des
Analyse-Dienstes erfolgt zur Wahrung unserer berechtigten Interessen an der bestmöglichen Bereitstellung unserer
Webseite (Rechtsgrundlage: Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO).
Dieser Analyse-Dienst von Google Ireland Limited, Irland und Google LLC, USA (zusammen
Google
),
verwendet Cookies oder andere Identifier, die auf Ihrem Endgerät gespeichert werden und Daten über Ihre Nutzung
unserer Webseite (z.B. IP-Adresse/Kennzeichen, Zeitpunkt und Dauer der Nutzung, Standort, Endgerät,
wiederkehrender
oder neuer Besuch, Zeitstempel des Absturzes) erfassen. In diesem Zusammenhang werden pseudonymisierte
Nutzungsprofile erstellt. Weitere Informationen zu den erfassten Daten finden Sie hier:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=de
.
Sie können die Speicherung von Cookies durch eine entsprechende Einstellung Ihres Webbrowsers verhindern. Dies
kann
allerdings dazu führen, dass Sie nicht alle Funktionalitäten unserer Webseite nutzen können.
Die in Bezug auf Ihre Nutzung unserer Webseite erfassten Daten können ggf. auch an einen Google-Server in den USA
übermittelt und dort gespeichert werden. Da die Funktion „IP anonymisieren“ für unsere Webseite aktiviert ist,
wird
Ihre IP-Adresse vor der Übermittlung innerhalb der Mitgliedstaaten der Europäischen Union oder in anderen
Vertragsstaaten des Abkommens über den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum bzw. der Schweiz zuerst von Google gekürzt.
Nur
in Ausnahmefällen übermittelt Google die vollständige IP-Adresse an einen Google-Server in den USA und kürzt
diese
dort. Google kombiniert die von Ihrem Endgerät übermittelte IP-Adresse nicht mit anderen Daten. Google hat sich
nach
dem EU-US Data Privacy Framework und dem Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework zertifiziert. Weitere Informationen
finden
Sie hier:
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
.
Falls Sie nicht wollen, dass Google Ihre Daten verwendet, besteht die Möglichkeit das folgende Browser-Add-on zur
Deaktivierung von Google zu verwenden:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
.
1.7 Videoinhalte
Für die Wiedergabe von Videos nutzen wir YouTube. Die Nutzung erfolgt zur Wahrung unserer berechtigten Interessen
an
der bestmöglichen Bereitstellung unserer Webseite (Rechtsgrundlage: Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO).
Videoinhalte werden von YouTube LLC, USA, einer Tochtergesellschaft von Google, angeboten. Für die gesamte
Datenverarbeitung im europäischen Raum ist Google Ireland Limited verantwortlich. Wenn Sie auf unserer Webseite
eine
Seite aufrufen, die ein YouTube-Video eingebettet hat, verbindet sich Ihr Browser automatisch mit den Servern
von
YouTube bzw. Google, welche sich auch in den USA befinden können. Dabei setzt YouTube zumindest ein Cookie, das
Ihre
IP-Adresse und unsere URL speichert. Wenn Sie in Ihrem YouTube-Konto eingeloggt sind, kann YouTube Ihre
Interaktionen auf unserer Webseite mit Hilfe von Cookies Ihrem Profil zuordnen. Dabei werden von YouTube
verschiedene zusätzliche Daten bearbeitet. Auf den Umfang, die Verwendung und die Dauer der Speicherung der von
Google erhobenen Daten haben wir keinen Einfluss. Google hat sich nach dem EU-US Data Privacy Framework und dem
Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework zertifiziert. Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz finden Sie unter:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
;
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
,
und
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
.
2. Social Media Plattformen
Wir unterhalten Onlinepräsenzen in verschiedenen sozialen Netzwerken, um mit den dort aktiven Interessenten und
Nutzern zu kommunizieren und diese über Innovation 6 und TOM zu informieren (Rechtsgrundlage: Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit.
f
DSGVO).
Auf unserer Webseite haben wir Links auf unsere Onlinepräsenzen bei folgenden sozialen Netzwerken eingebaut:
Facebook,
Instagram,
LinkedIn,
YouTube.
Wenn Sie auf die betreffenden Symbole klicken, werden Sie automatisch auf unser Profil bei der betreffenden
Plattform
weitergeleitet. Dabei wird eine direkte Verbindung zwischen Ihrem Webbrowser und den Servern der betreffenden
Plattform hergestellt, welche sich auch in einem Drittland (z.B. den USA) befinden können. Die Plattform erhält
die
Information, dass Sie mit Ihrer IP-Adresse unsere Website besucht und den Link aufgerufen haben. Wenn Sie einen
solchen Link aufrufen, während Sie in Ihrem Konto bei der betreffenden Plattform eingeloggt sind, können die
Inhalte
unserer Seite mit Ihrem Profil bei der Plattform verlinkt werden, was bedeutet, dass die Plattform Ihren Besuch
auf
unserer Website direkt Ihrem Benutzerkonto zuordnen kann. Wenn Sie dies verhindern möchten, sollten Sie sich
ausloggen, bevor Sie den entsprechenden Link aufrufen. Eine Zuordnung findet auf jeden Fall statt, wenn Sie sich
nach dem Aufruf des Links bei der betreffenden Plattform einloggen.
Wir weisen Sie darauf hin, dass Sie unsere Facebook-, Instagram-, LinkedIn- und YouTube-Seiten sowie ihre
Funktionen
in eigener Verantwortung nutzen. Dies gilt insbesondere für die Nutzung der interaktiven Funktionen (z.B.
Kommentieren, Teilen, Bewerten). Bei dieser Nutzung werden durch die entsprechenden Netzwerke personenbezogene
Daten
erhoben, die gegebenenfalls in Länder ausserhalb der Schweiz und der Europäischen Union übertragen und dort
verarbeitet werden.
Welche Informationen Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn und YouTube erheben und verarbeiten ist uns nicht bekannt. Für
eine detaillierte Darstellung der jeweiligen Verarbeitungen und der Widerspruchsmöglichkeiten (Opt-Out),
verweisen
wir auf die nachfolgend verlinkten Angaben dieser Anbieter.
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
Instagram:
https://privacycenter.instagram.com/policy/
LinkedIn:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls
YouTube:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
3. Hosting und Wartung
Die erhobenen Daten werden an den Cloud-Server unseres Hosting-Dienstleisters dogado GmbH, in Deutschland,
übermittelt und dort in Datenbanken von Innovation 6 gespeichert. dogado GmbH, in Deutschland, sowie das für die
Entwicklung und Wartung der Webseite zuständige IT-Unternehmen bitsfabrik GmbH, in Österreich, haben im
Zusammenhang
mit der Erbringung ihrer Dienstleistungen Zugriff auf diese Daten. Die Dienstleisterinnen greifen nur im
Zusammenhang mit dem Betrieb und der Wartung des Servers sowie der Wartung, Fehlerbehebung und Weiterentwicklung
unserer Webseite auf diese Daten zu. Die Nutzung dieser Dienstleistungen erfolgt zur Wahrung unserer
berechtigten
Interessen an der bestmöglichen Bereitstellung unserer Webseite (Rechtsgrundlage: Art 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO).
4. Übermittlung von Daten ins Ausland
Wie in dieser Datenschutzerklärung erwähnt (vgl. Ziff. 1.6 und 3) erfolgt eine Übermittlung von Daten an Personen
oder Unternehmen im Ausland. Hierbei werden die gesetzlichen Vorschriften zur Bekanntgabe von personenbezogenen
Daten an Dritte selbstverständlich eingehalten. Zu den Staaten, in welche Daten übermittelt werden, gehören
solche,
die gemäss Beschluss des Bundesrates (DSG) und der EU-Kommission (DSGVO) über ein angemessenes Datenschutzniveau
verfügen (z.B. Mitgliedstaaten des EWR, die Schweiz), aber auch solche Staaten (z.B. USA) deren
Datenschutzniveau
nicht als angemessen beurteilt wird. Sofern das betreffende Land über kein angemessenes Datenschutzniveau
verfügt
und keine ausdrückliche Einwilligung des Nutzer, keine vertraglich oder gesetzlich erforderliche Übermittlung
vorliegt sowie keine weitere Ausnahmebestimmung (Art. 49 DSGVO) Anwendung findet, schliessen wir Verträge mit
den
von der Europäischen Kommission und vom schweizerischen Datenschutz- und Öffentlichkeitsbeauftragen
(
EDÖB
) bereitgestellten Standard-Datenschutzklauseln ab, welche Garantien für den Schutz Ihrer
Daten beim Dienstleister oder Empfänger im Drittland vorsehen.
Hinweise zur Datenübermittlungen in die USA:
Die EU-Kommission hat aufgrund des mit den USA vereinbarten
EU-US Data Privacy Frameworks und der vom Präsidenten der USA erlassenen Executive Order vom 7. Oktober 2022 in
einem Angemessenheitsbeschluss festgelegt, dass die USA ein angemessenes Schutzniveau für personenbezogene Daten
gewährleistet. Dies gilt jedoch nur für US-Unternehmen, die sich nach dem EU-US Data Privacy Framework
zertifizieren
und sich damit zur Einhaltung von deren Vorgaben verpflichten. Die Information, ob sich ein von uns beigezogener
US-Dienstleister nach dem EU-US Data Privacy Framework zertifiziert hat, finden Sie in dieser
Datenschutzerklärung.
Sowohl die Liste aller zertifizierten US-Unternehmen als auch weitere Informationen zum EU-US Data Privacy
Framework
können Sie der Webseite des Handelsministeriums der USA unter https;//www.dataprivaxframework.gov entnehmen. Die
Verhandlungen der Schweiz mit den USA im Zusammenhang mit Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework und der Anerkennung
der
Angemessenheit des Datenschutzniveaus sind noch nicht abgeschlossen. Der entsprechende Entscheid des Bundesrates
steht noch aus.
5. Speicherdauer der Daten
Sämtliche personenbezogenen Daten, die wir während Ihres Besuchs auf unserer Webseite sammeln oder die Sie uns
übermitteln, löschen wir, sobald Sie für den Zweck, für den sie verarbeitet werden, nicht mehr erforderlich sind
(vgl. auch Ziff. 1.2 und Ziff. 1.4) und deren Aufbewahrung nicht aufgrund gesetzlicher Bestimmungen erforderlich
ist.
6. Datensicherheit
Wir treffen angemessene technische und organisatorische Sicherheitsvorkehrungen zum Schutz Ihrer
personenbezogenen
Daten vor unberechtigtem Zugriff und Missbrauch. Im Zusammenhang mit Subunternehmern, die wir einsetzen, um
unsere
Leistungen bereitzustellen, ergreifen wir zudem geeignete rechtliche Vorkehrungen, um für den Schutz Ihrer
personenbezogenen Daten gemäss den einschlägigen gesetzlichen Vorschriften zu sorgen.
7. Datenschutzrechte
Sie können im Rahmen des auf Sie anwendbaren Datenschutzrechts, und soweit darin vorgesehen,
Auskunft
über
Ihre bei uns gespeicherten Daten
verlangen
und haben das
Recht, Ihre Daten
in
einem gängigen maschinenlesbaren Format zu erhalten
. Ausserdem können Sie in begründeten Fällen die
Löschung oder Berichtigung Ihrer Daten
sowie die
Einschränkung von deren Verarbeitung
verlangen
, beziehungsweise der
Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten widersprechen
oder Ihre
Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung widerrufen
. Ihnen steht auch das
Beschwerderecht an die
zuständige Aufsichtsbehörde
zu.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass wir uns vorbehalten, unsererseits die gesetzlich vorgesehenen Einschränkungen geltend zu
machen, etwa wenn wir zur Aufbewahrung oder Verarbeitung gewisser Daten verpflichtet sind oder daran ein
überwiegendes Interesse haben.
8. Kontakt
Verantwortliche Stelle:
Für die Verarbeitung der Daten der Webseite ist Innovation 6 AG, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Schweiz
verantwortlich.
Wenn Sie datenschutzrechtliche Anliegen haben, wenden Sie sich bitte per E-Mail an
support@tommedications.com
oder per Post an Innovation 6 AG,
Support, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Schweiz.
Datenschutzbeauftragter und EU-Vertreter:
Unseren externen Datenschutzbeauftragten und EU-Vertreter erreichen Sie unter:
Pascal Winnen, Hemex Germany GmbH, Wallbrunstrasse 24, 79539 Lörrach, Deutschland.
E-Mail:
pascal.winnen@hemex.ch
TOM Website Privacy Policy
Innovation 6 AG, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Switzerland, registered in the commercial register of the
canton of Zurich under number CHE-263.807.653 (
Innovation 6
or
we
) is the
operator
of the website www.tommedications.com (
website
) and also provides the medication management app
TOM
(
TOM
). Innovation 6 is the controller for the processing of your personal data through the
website
and TOM.
Innovation 6 places great importance on the appropriate handling of the personal data of the user of our website
and
TOM (the
user
or
you
). Naturally, where relevant, we comply with the legal
requirements of the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (FADP), the Swiss Ordinance on Data Protection (DPO),
the
EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and any other applicable data protection provisions. Due to the
wider
geographical application, the terms of the GDPR are used below. In particular, the German terms
‘
Bearbeitung
’ of ‘
Personendaten
’ used in the FADP are replaced by the terms
‘
Verarbeitung
’ of ‘
personenbezogene Daten
’ in the GDPR (in both instances these translate to
‘processing’ of ‘personal data’ in English) and ‘
überwigendes Interesse
’ (‘overriding interest’) is
replaced by ‘
berechtiges Interesse
’ (‘legitimate interest’). However, the legal meaning of the terms is
still determined in accordance with the FADP in the context of the application of the FADP.
Below you will find details on the nature, scope and purpose of our processing of your personal data when you
visit
our website. You can find the TOM privacy policy here
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung#en
.
Please note that the following information may be amended from time to time by publishing an updated version of
this
privacy policy. This privacy policy was last amended on 23 November 2023.
1. Data collected, purpose of the collection and use of the data
1.1 Data collected automatically when you visit our website
When you visit our website, the following data is automatically collected:
data on network connections and website activity (e.g. IP address, name and URL of the requested file, host name
of the accessing computer, date and time of access)
device information for the device used (e.g. manufacturer, model, platform, operating system)
region or language settings
The processing of this data is required for the use of our website for technical reasons. In particular, it
guarantees the orderly operation and optimisation of the functionality and display quality of the website. This
data
is also used for internal statistical evaluation of user behaviour. This processing is required to safeguard the
legitimate interests of Innovation 6 (legal basis: Art. 6[1][f] GDPR).
1.2 Cookies
We also use cookies to make your visit to our website easier and more pleasant (see also section ‎1.6). Cookies
are
text files that your web browser automatically stores on your device when you visit our website. The session
cookies
used are deleted after each visit to our website, while persistent cookies are stored for a defined period after
the
end of the browser session and used to recognise returning users. If this is required under law, we obtain your
prior consent for the use of cookies (legal basis: Art. 6[1][a] and [f] GDPR).
You can prevent cookies from being stored on your device by configuring your web browser accordingly. However, if
you
disable all cookies, you may be unable to use some of the features of our website.
We use the following cookies on our website:
_ga
Cookie provider: Google Analytics
Lifespan: 2 years
Function: Google Analytics sets this cookie to uniquely identify users.
_gid
Cookie provider: Google Analytics
Lifespan: 24 hours
Function: Google Analytics sets this cookie to uniquely identify users.
_gat
Cookie provider: Google Analytics
Lifespan: 1 minute
Function: limiting the number of requests to Google servers within a certain period of time.
wp-wpml_current_language
Cookie provider: tom medications
Lifespan: 1 day
Function: storing the language setting.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Cookie provider: YouTube
Lifespan: 6 months
Function: enabling ad placement or retargeting to store and track a visitor’s identity and interactions.
YSC
Cookie provider: YouTube
Lifespan: session
Function: storing and tracking interactions.
511
Cookie provider: Google
Lifespan: 6 months
Function: authentication service.
AEC
Cookie provider: Google
Lifespan: 6 months
Function: ensuring that requests within a browser session are made by the user and not by other websites.
SOCS
Cookie provider: Google
Lifespan: 30 days
Function: storing cookie decisions.
CONSENT
Cookie provider: Google
Lifespan: 1 year
Function: storing cookie decisions.
c
Cookie provider: LinkedIn
Lifespan: 6 months
Function: authentication and tracking.
bcookie
Cookie provider: LinkedIn
Lifespan: 1 year
Function: browser identification cookie used for diagnostic purposes.
li_sugr
Cookie provider: LinkedIn
Lifespan: 3 months
Function: identifying probabilistic similarities of the identity of a user outside the designated countries.
AnalyticsSyncHistory
Cookie provider: LinkedIn
Lifespan: 1 month
Function: recording when there has been synchronisation with the cookie ‘lms_analytics’.
UserMatchHistory
Cookie provider: LinkedIn
Lifespan: 1 month
Function: synchronising the IDs of LinkedIn ads.
lidc
Cookie provider: LinkedIn
Lifespan: 1 day
Function: selecting the data centre.
1.3. Use of the contact form
If you contact us using the contact form on our website, we collect the following data:
First and last name (company email)
Email
Telephone number
Your message
We use this data to process and respond to your query (legal basis: Art. 6[1][a] GDPR).
1.4. Medication entry option
On our website you have the option of recording your medication plan as well as the daily dosage and timing of
these
medications. To help you, there are various country-specific medication databases to make it easier to identify
medications. In determining which database to access and/or the relevant country, the region and language
settings
of your mobile device are used and, in the event of problems, the IP address (legal basis: Art. 6[1][b] GDPR).
You can transmit the information you collect to TOM by using TOM to scan the QR code displayed on the website in
which your information is digitally encoded. The QR code does not include a tracking mechanism. If you are not
yet
using TOM, you will need to install TOM on your mobile device first. For information on the collection and use
of
your data in TOM, please refer to the TOM privacy policy.
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung#en
Once the information has been transferred to TOM or if you decide not to transfer the information entered to TOM,
both the information and the QR code are deleted from the website. This information is not stored or archived on
our
website.
1.5. Clicking on embedded external links
Through the external links embedded on our website, you will be redirected to the websites of third parties (e.g.
Google Play Store, Apple App Store, social networks, instant messaging services such as WhatsApp and Telegram).
Innovation 6 has no influence on, nor is it responsible for, the data collected and the data processing
operations
of these third parties. Please refer to the website in question to find out how it handles your data.
1.6. Analytics tool
Our website uses the analytics service Google Analytics (GA4). Analysis of the use of our website helps stabilise
and
improve our website and to generate crash reports. We use the analytics services to safeguard our legitimate
interest in the best possible provision of our website (legal basis: Art. 6[1][f] GDPR).
This analytics service provided by Google Ireland Limited, Ireland and Google LLC, USA (collectively
Google
) uses cookies or other identifiers that are stored on your device and that collect data
about your use of our website (e.g. IP address/ID number, time and duration of use, location, device, return or
new
visit, time stamp of crash). In this context, pseudonymised user profiles are created. You can find more
information
on the data collected here:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=en
.
You can prevent the storage of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on your web browser. However, if
you
disable all cookies, you may be unable to use some of the features of our website.
The data collected in connection with your use of our website may also be transmitted to a Google server in the
USA
and stored there. As the ‘IP anonymisation’ function is activated for our website, before transmission Google
will
truncate your IP address within the member states of the European Union or other signatory states to the
Agreement
on the European Economic Area or Switzerland. Only in exceptional cases is the complete IP address transmitted
to a
Google server in the US and truncated there. Google does not combine the IP address transmitted by your device
with
other data. Google is certified under the EU-US Data Privacy Framework and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework.
You
can find more information here:
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
.
If you do not want Google to use your data, you can use the following browser add-on to deactivate Google:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en
.
1.7. Video content
We use YouTube to play videos. This usage safeguards our legitimate interest in the best possible provision of
our
website (legal basis: Art. 6[1][f] GDPR).
Video content is provided by YouTube LLC, USA, a subsidiary of Google. Google Ireland Limited is responsible for
all
data processing in Europe. If you visit a page on our website that has a YouTube video embedded in it, your
browser
automatically connects to the servers of YouTube or Google, which may be located in the USA. YouTube sets at
least
one cookie that stores your IP address and our URL. If you are logged in to your YouTube account, YouTube can
use
cookies to assign your interactions on our website to your profile. YouTube processes various forms of
additional
data. We have no control over the scope, use and duration of storage with respect to data collected by Google.
Google is certified under the EU-US Data Privacy Framework and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. You can find
more information on data protection at:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
;
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en
and
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
.
2. Social media platforms
We maintain an online presence in various social networks to communicate with interested parties and users active
there and to inform them about Innovation 6 and TOM (legal basis: Art. 6[1][f] GDPR).
On our website we have embedded links to our online presence in the following social networks:
Facebook
Instagram
LinkedIn
YouTube
When you click on the relevant icons, you will be automatically redirected to our profile on the platform in
question. A direct connection is established between your web browser and the servers of the platform in
question,
which may be located in a third country (e.g. the USA). The platform receives the information that you have
visited
our website with your IP address and accessed the link. When you click on such a link while you are logged into
your
account with the relevant platform, the content of our site may be linked to your profile on the platform, which
means that the platform can directly associate your visit to our website with your user account. If you wish to
prevent this, log out before you click on the relevant link. Allocation will definitely take place if you log in
to
the relevant platform after clicking on the link.
Please note that you use our Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn and YouTube pages and their functions under your own
responsibility. This applies in particular to the use of interactive functions (e.g. comment, share, rate).
During
this use, personal data is collected by the relevant networks and may be transmitted to countries outside
Switzerland and the European Union and processed there.
We do not know what information Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn and YouTube collect and process. For a detailed
description of the respective processing operations and options for opting out, please refer to the following
linked
information of these providers.
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
Instagram:
https://privacycenter.instagram.com/policy/
LinkedIn:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls
YouTube:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
3. Hosting and maintenance
The data collected is transferred to the cloud server of our hosting service provider dogado GmbH, in Germany,
and
stored there in Innovation 6 databases. dogado GmbH, in Germany, and the IT company bitsfabrik GmbH, in Austria,
which is responsible for the development and maintenance of the website, have access to this data in connection
with
the provision of their services. The service providers only access this data in association with the operation
and
maintenance of the server, and the maintenance, troubleshooting and ongoing development of our website. We use
these
services to safeguard our legitimate interest in the best possible provision of our website (legal basis: Art.
6[1][f] GDPR).
4. Transmission of data abroad
As mentioned in this privacy policy (see sections 1.6 and 3), data is transferred to persons and/or companies
abroad.
Naturally the statutory provisions on disclosure of personal data to third parties are observed in this
transfer.
Some of the countries to which data is transferred have an adequate level of data protection as decided by the
Federal Council (FADP) and the European Commission (GDPR) (e.g. member states of the EEA, Switzerland), while
other
countries (e.g. the USA) have a level of data protection assessed as inadequate. If the country concerned does
not
have an adequate level of data protection and if there is no explicit consent from the user, transmission is not
required by contract or law and there is no other applicable exemption provision (Art. 49 GDPR), we conclude
contracts with the standard data protection clauses provided by the European Commission and Switzerland’s
Federal
Data Protection and Information Commissioner (
FDPIC
), which provide guarantees for the
protection
of your data at the service provider or recipient in the third country.
Information on data transfer to the USA:
Based on the EU-US Data Privacy Framework agreed with the USA
and
the Executive Order issued by the President of the USA on 7 October 2022, the European Commission has determined
in
an adequacy decision that the USA ensures an adequate level of protection for personal data. However, this only
applies to US companies that are certified under the EU-US Data Privacy Framework and thus undertake to comply
with
its provisions. You can find information on whether a US service provider we have engaged is certified under the
EU-US Data Privacy Framework in this privacy policy. You can find the list of all certified US companies and
more
information on the EU-US Data Privacy Framework on the US Department of Commerce website at
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov. Negotiations between Switzerland and the USA in connection with the
Swiss-US
Data Privacy Framework and recognition of the adequacy of the level of data protection are ongoing. The decision
of
the Federal Council is still pending.
5. Data storage period
All personal data that we collect during your visit to our website or that you transfer to us is deleted as soon
as
it is no longer required for the purpose for which it was processed (see also section ‎1.2 and section ‎1.4) and
if
its retention is not required by law.
6. Data security
We take appropriate technical and organisational security precautions to protect your personal data from
unauthorised
access and misuse. In connection with subcontractors used to provide our services, we also take appropriate
legal
precautions to ensure the protection of your personal data in line with the relevant statutory provisions.
7. Data protection rights
Within the context of the data protection legislation applicable to you and where provided for therein, you may
request information on your data stored by us
, and you have the
right to receive your
data
in a commonly used machine-readable format
. In justified cases, you may also request the
erasure or correction of your data
or the
restriction of its processing
,
or object to the processing of your data
or
withdraw your consent to
processing
.
You also have the right to
lodge a complaint with the responsible supervisory authority
.
Please note that we reserve the right to assert our legally mandated right to impose restrictions, for instance
if we
are obliged to retain or process certain data or have an overriding interest in it.
8. Contact
Controller:
Innovation 6 AG, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Switzerland, is responsible for the processing of the
website’s data.
If you have any concerns related to data protection, please contact us by email at
support@tommedications.com
or by post at Innovation 6 AG,
Support,
Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Switzerland.
Data protection officer and EU representative:
You can use the following contact details to contact our external data protection officer and EU representative:
Pascal Winnen, Hemex Germany GmbH, Wallbrunstrasse 24, 79539 Lörrach, Germany.
Email:
pascal.winnen@hemex.ch
Declaración de protección de datos del sitio web de TOM
Innovation 6 AG, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Suiza, inscrita en el Registro Mercantil del Cantón de
Zúrich
con el número CHE-263.807.653 (
Innovation 6
o
nosotros
) es el operador del
sitio
web www.tommedications.com (
sitio web
) y también proporciona la aplicación de gestión de
medicamentos TOM (
TOM
). Innovation 6 es la entidad responsable del tratamiento de los datos
personales del sitio web y de TOM.
Para facilitar la lectura del presente documento emplearemos en lo sucesivo solo el masculino genérico, pero nos
referimos a personas de todos los géneros.
El manejo correcto de los datos personales del usuario de nuestro sitio web y de TOM (
usted
o
el usuario
) reviste para Innovation 6 una importancia fundamental. En la medida que sean de
aplicación, cumplimos por supuesto las disposiciones legales de la Ley federal suiza de Protección de Datos
(DSG,
por sus siglas en alemán), el Reglamento suizo sobre la Ley federal de Protección de Datos (DSV, por sus siglas
en
alemán) y el Reglamento General de Protección de Datos de la UE (RGPD), así como las demás disposiciones sobre
protección de datos que sean pertinentes. Debido a que el ámbito geográfico de aplicación es más amplio, a
continuación se utilizarán los términos del RGPD. En particular, en lugar de los términos «procesamiento» de
«datos
personales» e «interés preponderante» utilizados en la DSG, se utilizarán los términos «tratamiento» de «datos
personales» e «interés legítimo» utilizados en el RGPD. Sin embargo, el significado legal de los términos en el
ámbito de aplicación de la DSG seguirá determinándose de acuerdo con la DSG.
A continuación, encontrará información sobre la modalidad, el alcance y la finalidad del tratamiento de sus datos
personales al visitar nuestro sitio web. La Declaración de protección de datos de TOM se puede encontrar aquí
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung#es
.
Tenga en cuenta que las siguientes disposiciones se podrán adaptar ocasionalmente mediante la publicación de una
versión modificada de esta Declaración de protección de datos. Esta Declaración de protección de datos se
modificó
por última vez el 23 de noviembre de 2023.
1. Datos recopilados, finalidad de la recopilación y uso de los datos
1.1 Datos recopilados automáticamente al visitar nuestro sitio web
Cuando visita nuestro sitio web, se recopilan automáticamente los siguientes datos:
Datos sobre las conexiones de red y las actividades del sitio web (p. ej., dirección IP, nombre y URL del
archivo requerido, nombre del equipo del ordenador que usa para acceder al sitio, fecha y hora de acceso).
Información sobre el terminal utilizado (p. ej., fabricante, modelo, plataforma, sistema operativo).
Configuración de región o idioma.
El tratamiento de estos datos es necesario por motivos técnicos para utilizar nuestro sitio web. En particular,
garantiza el adecuado funcionamiento y optimiza la funcionalidad y la calidad de imagen del sitio web. Además,
estos
datos se utilizan para realizar evaluaciones internas con fines estadísticos sobre el comportamiento de los
usuarios. El tratamiento es necesario para salvaguardar los intereses legítimos de Innovation 6 (fundamento
jurídico: art. 6, apdo. 1, letra f del RGPD).
1.2. Cookies
También utilizamos cookies para hacer que su visita a nuestro sitio web sea más fácil y agradable (véase también
el
punto 1.6). Las cookies son archivos de texto que su navegador web almacena automáticamente en su terminal
cuando
visita nuestro sitio web. Se utilizan cookies de sesión, que se eliminan después de cada visita a nuestro sitio
web,
o cookies permanentes, que se almacenan durante un período de tiempo determinado después de finalizar la sesión
del
navegador y sirven para reconocer al usuario. Si es legalmente necesario, obtendremos su consentimiento previo
para
el uso de cookies (fundamento jurídico: art. 6, apdo. 1, letras a y f del RGPD).
Puede evitar el almacenamiento de cookies en su terminal configurando adecuadamente su navegador web. Sin
embargo, es
posible que no pueda utilizar todas las funciones de nuestro sitio web.
En nuestro sitio web utilizamos las siguientes cookies:
_ga
Proveedor de la cookie: Google Analytics
Duración: 2 años
Función: Google Analytics utiliza esta cookie para identificar inequívocamente a los usuarios.
_gid
Proveedor de la cookie: Google Analytics
Duración: 24 horas
Función: Google Analytics utiliza esta cookie para identificar inequívocamente a los usuarios.
_gat
Proveedor de la cookie: Google Analytics
Duración: 1 minuto
Función: Esta cookie se utiliza para limitar el número de solicitudes a los servidores de Google en un período de
tiempo determinado.
wp-wpml_current_language
Proveedor de la cookie: tom medications
Duración: 1 día
Función: Esta cookie sirve para almacenar la configuración de idioma.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Proveedor de la cookie: YouTube
Duración: 6 meses
Función: Para permitir la inserción de anuncios o el retargeting, así como almacenar y rastrear la identidad de
un
visitante y las interacciones.
YSC
Proveedor de la cookie: YouTube
Duración: Sesión
Función: Para almacenar y realizar un seguimiento de las interacciones.
511
Proveedor de la cookie: Google
Duración: 6 meses
Función: Servicio de autenticación.
AEC
Proveedor de la cookie: Google
Duración: 6 meses
Función: Esta cookie garantiza que las solicitudes sean realizadas por el usuario dentro de una sesión de
navegación
y no por otros sitios web.
SOCS
Proveedor de la cookie: Google
Duración: 30 días
Función: Sirve para almacenar las decisiones sobre cookies.
CONSENT
Proveedor de la cookie: Google
Duración: 1 año
Función: Sirve para almacenar las decisiones sobre cookies.
c
Proveedor de la cookie: LinkedIn
Duración: 6 meses
Función: Sirve para la autenticación y el seguimiento.
bcookie
Proveedor de la cookie: LinkedIn
Duración: 1 año
Función: Esta cookie de identificación del navegador se utiliza con fines de diagnóstico.
li_sugr
Proveedor de la cookie: LinkedIn
Duración: 3 meses
Función: Esta cookie se utiliza para determinar coincidencias probabilísticas de la identidad de un usuario fuera
de
los países designados.
AnalyticsSyncHistory
Proveedor de la cookie: LinkedIn
Duración: 1 mes
Función: Con esta cookie se almacena cuándo se ha producido una sincronización con la cookie «lms_analytics
cookie».
UserMatchHistory
Proveedor de la cookie: LinkedIn
Duración: 1 mes
Función: Esta cookie sincroniza los ID de LinkedIn Ads.
lidc
Proveedor de la cookie: LinkedIn
Duración: 1 día
Función: Esta cookie permite la selección del centro de datos.
1.3. Uso del formulario de contacto
Si se pone en contacto con nosotros a través del formulario de contacto en nuestro sitio web, recopilamos los
siguientes datos:
Nombre y apellidos (correo electrónico de la empresa)
Dirección de correo electrónico
Número de teléfono
Su mensaje
Utilizaremos estos datos para tramitar su solicitud y responder a su consulta (fundamento jurídico: art. 6, apdo.
1,
letra a del RGPD).
1.4. Posibilidad de administración de medicamentos
En nuestro sitio web existe la posibilidad de registrar el plan de toma de medicamentos, así como la dosis diaria
y
la hora de administración de estos medicamentos. Para ayudarle, disponemos de distintas bases de datos de
medicamentos específicas para cada país, que pretenden facilitar la identificación de los medicamentos. Para
identificar la base de datos de medicamentos o el país que correspondan, se utiliza la configuración de región e
idioma de su navegador web y, en caso de que surja algún problema, su dirección IP (fundamento jurídico: art. 6,
apdo. 1, letra b del RGPD).
Los datos recopilados por usted pueden ser transmitidos a TOM escaneando con TOM el código QR que aparece en el
sitio
web, en el que sus datos están codificados digitalmente. El código QR no contiene ningún mecanismo de rastreo.
Si
aún no utiliza TOM, debe instalar TOM previamente en su dispositivo móvil. Para obtener información sobre la
recopilación y el uso de sus datos en TOM, consulte la Declaración de protección de datos de TOM.
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung#es
]
Una vez transmitida la información a TOM, o si decide no transmitir la información introducida a TOM, se
eliminará
tanto la información como el código QR del sitio web. Esta información no se almacenará ni se archivará en
nuestro
sitio web.
1.5. Acceso a enlaces externos incrustados
Los enlaces externos incrustados en nuestro sitio web le redirigirán a sitios web de terceros (por ejemplo,
Google
Play Store, Apple App Store, redes sociales, servicios de mensajería instantánea como WhatsApp o Telegram).
Innovation 6 no ejerce ninguna influencia ni es responsable de los datos recopilados ni de las operaciones de
tratamiento de datos de estos terceros. Infórmese allí sobre el tratamiento de sus datos.
1.6. Herramienta de análisis
Nuestro sitio web utiliza el servicio de análisis Google Analytics (GA4). Los análisis sobre el uso de nuestro
sitio
web sirven para estabilizar y mejorar nuestro sitio web y para generar informes de fallos. Utilizamos este
servicio
con el fin de salvaguardar nuestro interés legítimo en la óptima prestación de las funciones de nuestro sitio
web
(fundamento jurídico: art. 6, apdo. 1, letra f del RGPD).
Este servicio de análisis de Google Ireland Limited, Irlanda y Google LLC, EE. UU. (conjuntamente
Google
), utiliza cookies u otros identificadores que se almacenan en su terminal y recopila
información sobre su uso de nuestro sitio web (por ejemplo, dirección IP/identificador, hora y duración del uso,
ubicación, terminal, visita repetida o nueva, marca de tiempo del fallo). En este contexto, se crean perfiles de
uso
seudonimizados. En el siguiente enlace encontrará más información sobre los datos recopilados:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=es
.
Puede evitar el almacenamiento de cookies mediante la configuración correspondiente de su navegador web. Sin
embargo, es posible que no pueda utilizar todas las funciones de nuestro sitio web.
Dado el caso, los datos recopilados en relación con el uso de nuestro sitio web pueden transmitirse también a un
servidor de Google en EE. UU. y almacenarse allí. Como la función «anonimizar IP» está activada para nuestro
sitio
web, Google acortará su dirección IP antes de realizar la transmisión dentro de los Estados miembros de la Unión
Europea, o en otros Estados parte del Acuerdo sobre el Espacio Económico Europeo o de Suiza. Solo en casos
excepcionales, Google transmitirá la dirección IP completa a un servidor de Google en EE. UU. y la acortará
allí.
Google no combinará la dirección IP transmitida por su terminal con otros datos. Google ha obtenido la
certificación
del Marco de Privacidad de Datos UE-EE. UU. y del Marco de Privacidad de Datos Suiza-EE. UU. Para más
información,
visite:
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/.
Si no desea que Google utilice sus datos, puede utilizar el siguiente complemento del navegador para desactivar
Google:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=es
.
1.7. Contenidos en vídeo
Para la reproducción de los vídeos empleamos YouTube. Esta utilización se realiza con el fin de salvaguardar
nuestro
interés legítimo en la óptima prestación de las funciones de nuestro sitio web (fundamento jurídico: art. 6,
apdo.
1, letra f del RGPD).
El contenido en vídeo es ofrecido por YouTube LLC, EE. UU., una filial de Google. Google Ireland Limited es
responsable de todo el tratamiento de datos en Europa. Cuando accede a una página de nuestro sitio web que
contiene
un vídeo de YouTube, su navegador se conecta automáticamente a los servidores de YouTube o Google, que también
pueden estar ubicados en los Estados Unidos. Al hacerlo, YouTube instala al menos una cookie que almacena su
dirección IP y nuestra URL. Si ha iniciado sesión en su cuenta de YouTube, YouTube puede asociar sus
interacciones
en nuestro sitio web a su perfil mediante cookies. Para ello, YouTube trata diversos datos adicionales. No
tenemos
control alguno sobre el alcance, la utilización y la duración del almacenamiento de los datos recopilados por
Google. Google ha obtenido la certificación del Marco de Privacidad de Datos UE-EE. UU. y del Marco de
Privacidad de
Datos Suiza-EE. UU. Para más información sobre la protección de datos, visite:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
,
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=es
y
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
.
2. Plataformas de redes sociales
Estamos presentes en diferentes redes sociales para comunicarnos con los interesados y usuarios activos e
informarles
sobre Innovation 6 y TOM (fundamento jurídico: art. 6, apdo. 1, letra f del RGPD).
En nuestro sitio web hemos incorporado enlaces a nuestra presencia en línea en las siguientes redes sociales:
Facebook
Instagram
LinkedIn
YouTube
Al hacer clic en los iconos correspondientes, se le redirigirá automáticamente a nuestro perfil en la plataforma
correspondiente. Esto crea una conexión directa entre su navegador web y los servidores de la plataforma en
cuestión, que también pueden estar ubicados en un tercer país (por ejemplo, EE. UU.). La plataforma recibe la
información de que usted ha visitado nuestro sitio web con su dirección IP y ha accedido al enlace. Si accede a
un
enlace de este tipo mientras está conectado a su cuenta en la plataforma correspondiente, el contenido de
nuestro
sitio puede estar asociado con su perfil vinculado a la plataforma, lo que significa que la plataforma puede
asociar
su visita a nuestro sitio web directamente con su cuenta de usuario. Si desea evitar esto, debe cerrar la sesión
antes de acceder al enlace correspondiente. En cualquier caso, se realizará una asignación si inicia sesión en
la
plataforma correspondiente después de acceder al enlace.
Tenga en cuenta que el uso de nuestras páginas de Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn y YouTube, así como de sus
funciones,
es bajo su propia responsabilidad. Esto se aplica en particular al uso de las funciones interactivas (por
ejemplo,
comentar, compartir, evaluar). Durante este uso, las redes correspondientes recopilan datos personales que, en
algunos casos, pueden ser transferidos y tratados en países fuera de Suiza y la Unión Europea.
No sabemos qué información recopilan y procesan Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn y YouTube. Para una descripción
detallada de los respectivos tratamientos y de las posibilidades de oposición (opt-out), nos remitimos a la
información de estos proveedores, que se encuentra a continuación.
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
Instagram:
https://privacycenter.instagram.com/policy/
LinkedIn:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls
YouTube:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
3. Alojamiento de Internet y mantenimiento
Los datos recopilados se transmiten al servidor en la nube de nuestro proveedor de servicios de alojamiento
dogado
GmbH, en Alemania, y se almacenan allí en bases de datos de Innovation 6. dogado GmbH, en Alemania, y bitsfabrik
GmbH, en Austria, la empresa informática responsable del desarrollo y mantenimiento del sitio web, tienen acceso
a
estos datos en el marco de la prestación de sus servicios. Las empresas proveedoras de servicios solo accederán
a
los datos en el contexto de la operación y el mantenimiento del servidor, además del mantenimiento, la solución
de
problemas y el desarrollo continuo de nuestro sitio web. Utilizamos estos servicios con el fin de salvaguardar
nuestro interés legítimo en la óptima prestación de las funciones de nuestro sitio web (fundamento jurídico:
art. 6,
apdo. 1, letra f del RGPD).
4. Transmisión de los datos a países extranjeros
Como se indica en la presente Declaración de protección de datos (véanse los puntos 1.6 y 3), los datos se
transfieren a personas o empresas en el extranjero. Por supuesto, se respetarán las disposiciones legales
relativas
a la divulgación de datos personales a terceros. Los países a los que se transfieren los datos incluyen aquellos
que, de conformidad con la decisión del Consejo Federal (DSG) y de la Comisión Europea (RGPD) cuentan con un
nivel
adecuado de protección de los datos (por ejemplo, Estados miembros del EEE, Suiza), pero también países (por
ejemplo, EE. UU.) cuyo nivel de protección de datos no se considera adecuado. En caso de que el país en cuestión
no
disponga de un nivel adecuado de protección de datos, sin el consentimiento explícito del usuario y sin la
existencia de una obligación contractual o legal de transmisión u otra excepción (art. 49 RGPD), firmamos
contratos
con las cláusulas estándar de protección de datos proporcionadas por la Comisión Europea y por el Supervisor
Suizo
de Protección de Datos y Publicidad (
EDÖB
), que proporcionan garantías para la protección de
sus
datos ante el proveedor o destinatario del servicio en el tercer país.
Aviso sobre las transferencias de datos a EE. UU.:
sobre la base del Marco de Privacidad de Datos
UE-EE. UU.
acordado con EE. UU. y de la Orden Ejecutiva del Presidente de los EE. UU., decretada el 7 de octubre de 2022 en
una
Decisión de adecuación, los Estados Unidos garantizan un nivel adecuado de protección de los datos personales.
Sin
embargo, esto solo se aplica a las empresas estadounidenses que se certifican de acuerdo con el Marco de
Privacidad
de Datos UE-EE. UU. y se comprometen a cumplir con sus requisitos. Para saber si un proveedor de servicios de
EE. UU. contratado por nosotros está certificado según el Marco de Privacidad de Datos UE-EE. UU., consulte esta
Declaración de protección de datos. En el sitio web del Departamento de Comercio de EE. UU.
https;//www.dataprivaxframework.gov encontrará una lista de todas las empresas certificadas de EE. UU. y más
información sobre el Marco de Privacidad de Datos UE-EE. UU. Las negociaciones entre Suiza y EE. UU. en relación
con
el Marco de Privacidad de Datos suizo-estadounidense y el reconocimiento de la adecuación del nivel de
protección de
datos aún no han concluido. El Consejo Federal todavía no ha tomado una decisión al respecto.
5. Período de almacenamiento de los datos
Eliminaremos todos los datos personales que recopilamos durante su visita a nuestro sitio web o que usted nos
transmita en cuanto dejen de ser necesarios para los fines para los que se tratan (véanse también los puntos 1.2
y
1.4), y cuya conservación no sea obligatoria en virtud de disposiciones legales.
6. Seguridad de los datos
Adoptamos medidas de seguridad adecuadas, tanto de carácter técnico como organizativo, para proteger sus datos
personales del acceso no autorizado y el uso indebido. Además, en lo que respecta a los subcontratistas que
utilizamos para prestar nuestros servicios, adoptamos medidas legales adecuadas para garantizar la protección de
sus
datos personales de conformidad con las leyes vigentes.
7. Derechos en materia de protección de datos
En virtud de las disposiciones sobre protección de datos que le sean aplicables y en la medida en que en esas
disposiciones esté previsto hacerlo así, usted tiene derecho a recibir
información acerca de los datos
que
hemos almacenado sobre su persona
, así como también tiene
derecho a recibir sus datos en un
soporte digital convencional
. Además, en casos justificados, podrá solicitar la
eliminación
o
la corrección de sus datos
, así como la
limitación de su tratamiento
, y podrá
oponerse al tratamiento de sus datos
o
revocar su consentimiento para el
tratamiento
. También tendrá
derecho a presentar una queja ante la autoridad de control
competente
.
Tenga en cuenta que, por nuestra parte, nos reservamos el derecho de hacer valer las limitaciones previstas en la
ley, por ejemplo, cuando estemos obligados a conservar o tratar determinados datos o en caso de tener un interés
legítimo en los mismos.
8. Contacto
Entidad responsable:
Innovation 6 AG, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil (Suiza) es la responsable del tratamiento de los datos del
sitio web.
Si tiene cualquier duda relacionada con la protección legal de sus datos, comuníquese con nosotros por correo
electrónico en la dirección
support@tommedications.com
o por
correo
postal a: Innovation 6 AG, Support, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil (Suiza).
Encargado de la protección de datos y representante para la UE:
Podrá ponerse en contacto con nuestro encargado de protección de datos y representante para la UE en:
Pascal Winnen, Hemex Germany GmbH, Wallbrunstrasse 24, 79539 Lörrach, Alemania.
Correo electrónico:
pascal.winnen@hemex.ch
Déclaration de confidentialité du site TOM
Innovation 6 SA, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Suisse, inscrite au registre du commerce du canton de
Zurich
sous le numéro CHE-263.807.653 (ci-après «
Innovation 6
» ou «
nous
») exploite le
site Internet www.tommedications.com (ci-après «
site
») et met également à disposition
l’application
de gestion des médicaments TOM (ci-après «
TOM
»). Innovation 6 est la responsable du traitement
des
données à caractère personnel pour le site et pour TOM.
Pour une meilleure lisibilité, nous utilisons ci-après le masculin générique pour désigner les personnes des deux
sexes.
La bonne gestion des données à caractère personnel de l’utilisateur de notre site et de TOM (ci-après
l’«
utilisateur
» ou «
vous
») est une préoccupation centrale d’Innovation 6. Dans
la
mesure où elles s’appliquent, nous respectons bien évidemment les dispositions de la loi fédérale suisse sur la
protection des données (LPD), de l’ordonnance suisse relative à la loi fédérale sur la protection des données
(OLPD)
et du règlement général sur la protection des données (RGPD) de l’UE ainsi que d’autres dispositions relatives à
la
protection des données applicables. En raison d’une application géographique plus large, nous utilisons ci-après
les
termes du RGPD. En particulier, les termes «données personnelles» et «intérêt prépondérant» employés dans la LPD
sont remplacés par les termes «données à caractère personnel» et «intérêt légitime» employés dans le RGPD. Dans
le
cadre de l’application de la LPD, la signification légale des termes continue toutefois d’être déterminée par
cette
dernière.
Nous vous fournissons ci-après des informations sur le type, l’étendue et la finalité du traitement de vos
données à
caractère personnel lors de la visite de notre site. Vous pouvez consulter la déclaration de confidentialité de
TOM
ici
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung#fr
.
Veuillez noter que les indications suivantes sont susceptibles d’être ajustées après publication d’une version
modifiée de la présente déclaration de confidentialité. Cette déclaration de confidentialité a été mise à jour
pour
la dernière fois le 23 novembre 2023.
1. Données collectées, but de cette collecte et utilisation des données
1.1 Données collectées automatiquement lors de la visite de notre site
Les données suivantes sont automatiquement collectées lors de la visite de notre site:
données relatives à la connexion réseau et aux activités sur le site (p. ex. adresse IP, nom et URL du fichier
demandé, nom d’hôte de l’ordinateur connecté, date et heure de l’accès);
informations relatives à l’appareil utilisé (p. ex. fabricant, modèle, plateforme, système d’exploitation);
réglages régionaux ou linguistiques.
Le traitement de ces données est nécessaire à l’utilisation de notre site pour des raisons techniques. Il
garantit
notamment le bon fonctionnement du site et permet aussi d’optimiser les fonctionnalités et la qualité de
l’affichage. Ces données sont par ailleurs utilisées à des fins d’évaluations statistiques internes du
comportement
des utilisateurs. Le traitement est nécessaire aux fins des intérêts légitimes d’Innovation 6 (base juridique:
art. 6 al. 1 let. f RGPD).
1.2 Cookies
Nous utilisons également des cookies pour faciliter votre visite sur notre site et la rendre plus agréable (voir
également point 1.6). Les cookies sont des fichiers texte que votre navigateur enregistre automatiquement sur
votre
appareil lorsque vous consultez notre site. Il s’agit là de cookies de session qui sont effacés après chaque
visite
de notre site, mais aussi de cookies permanents qui sont sauvegardés pour une période définie après fermeture du
navigateur et qui servent à reconnaître l’utilisateur. Si cela est nécessaire d’un point de vue légal, nous vous
demandons votre consentement avant d’utiliser des cookies (base juridique: art. 6 al. 1 let. a et f RGPD).
Vous pouvez configurer votre navigateur de manière à empêcher l’enregistrement de cookies sur votre appareil. Si
vous
le faites, il se peut néanmoins que les fonctionnalités de notre site soient limitées.
Nous utilisons les cookies suivants sur notre site:
_ga
Fournisseur de cookies: Google Analytics
Durée de vie: 2 ans
Fonction: Google Analytics utilise ce cookie pour l’identification unique des utilisateurs.
_gid
Fournisseur de cookies: Google Analytics
Durée de vie: 24 heures
Fonction: Google Analytics utilise ce cookie pour l’identification unique des utilisateurs.
_gat
Fournisseur de cookies: Google Analytics
Durée de vie: 1 minute
Fonction: ce cookie est installé pour limiter le nombre de requêtes adressées aux serveurs de Google au cours
d’une
période donnée.
wp-wpml_current_language
Fournisseur de cookies: TOM Medications
Durée de vie: 1 journée
Fonction: ce cookie sert à enregistrer le réglage linguistique.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Fournisseur de cookies: YouTube
Durée de vie: 6 mois
Fonction: permet la diffusion d’annonces ou le reciblage, enregistre et suit l’identité d’un visiteur et ses
interactions.
YSC
Fournisseur de cookies: YouTube
Durée de vie: durée de la session
Fonction: enregistre et suit les interactions.
511
Fournisseur de cookies: Google
Durée de vie: 6 mois
Fonction: sert à l’authentification.
AEC
Fournisseur de cookies: Google
Durée de vie: 6 mois
Fonction: ce cookie garantit que les requêtes d’une session de navigation sont effectuées par l’utilisateur et
non
par d’autres sites Web.
SOC
Fournisseur de cookies: Google
Durée de vie: 30 jours
Fonction: sert à enregistrer les décisions en matière de cookies.
CONSENT
Fournisseur de cookies: Google
Durée de vie: 1 an
Fonction: sert à enregistrer les décisions en matière de cookies.
c
Fournisseur de cookies: LinkedIn
Durée de vie: 6 mois
Fonction: sert à l’authentification et au suivi.
bcookie
Fournisseur de cookies: LinkedIn
Durée de vie: 1 an
Fonction: ce cookie d’identification de navigateur est utilisé à des fins de diagnostic.
li_sugr
Fournisseur de cookies: LinkedIn
Durée de vie: 3 mois
Fonction: ce cookie permet de déterminer les correspondances probabilistes de l’identité d’un utilisateur en
dehors
des pays désignés.
AnalyticsSyncHistory
Fournisseur de cookies: LinkedIn
Durée de vie: 1 mois
Fonction: ce cookie enregistre la date et l’heure à laquelle une synchronisation avec le cookie «lms_analytics
cookie» a eu lieu.
UserMatchHistory
Fournisseur de cookies: LinkedIn
Durée de vie: 1 mois
Fonction: ce cookie permet de synchroniser les identifiants des LinkedIn Ads.
lidc
Fournisseur de cookies: LinkedIn
Durée de vie: 1 jour
Fonction: ce cookie permet de sélectionner le centre de données.
1.3 Utilisation du formulaire de contact
Si vous nous contactez au moyen du formulaire de contact sur notre site, nous collectons les données suivantes:
Prénom et nom (e-mail d’entreprise);
Adresse e-mail;
Numéro de téléphone;
Votre message.
Nous utilisons ces données pour traiter votre demande et répondre à votre question (base juridique: art. 6 al. 1
let. a RGPD).
1.4 Possibilité d’enregistrer des médicaments
Sur notre site, il est possible d’enregistrer le plan de médication ainsi que le dosage journalier et l’heure de
prise des médicaments. Pour vous assister, des bases de données de médicaments spécifiques à différents pays
sont à
disposition et devraient permettre de trouver facilement votre préparation. Pour identifier la base de données
de
médicaments à utiliser et le pays pertinent, le site utilise les réglages régionaux et linguistiques de votre
navigateur et, en cas de problèmes, l’adresse IP (base juridique: art. 6 al. 1 let. b RGPD).
Vous pouvez transférer sur TOM les données que vous avez saisies en l’utilisant pour scanner le code QR affiché
sur
le site, dans lequel vos données sont codées numériquement. Le code QR ne contient aucun mécanisme de suivi. Si
vous
n’utilisez pas encore TOM, vous devez d’abord l’installer sur votre appareil mobile. Pour plus d’informations
sur la
saisie et l’utilisation de vos données dans TOM, merci de vous référer à la déclaration de confidentialité de
TOM.
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung#fr
Après transfert des données vers TOM, ou si vous décidez de ne pas procéder à ce transfert, les données et le
code QR
sont supprimés du site. Ces informations ne sont ni stockées ni archivées sur notre site.
1.5. Consultation de liens externes intégrés
Les liens externes intégrés sur notre site vous redirigent vers des site tiers (p. ex. Google Play Store, App
Store
Apple, réseaux sociaux, services de messagerie instantanée tels que WhatsApp ou Telegram). Innovation 6 n’a
aucune
influence sur les données collectées et les processus de traitement des données de ces tiers et n’en est donc
pas
responsable. Merci de vous renseigner auprès de ces sites concernant le traitement de vos données.
1.6. Outil d’analyse
Notre site Internet utilise le service d’analyse Google Analytics (GA4). Les analyses relatives à l’utilisation
de
notre site servent à stabiliser et à améliorer ce dernier et à établir des rapports de plantage. L’utilisation
de ce
service d’analyse est nécessaire aux fins de nos intérêts légitimes à mettre notre site à disposition dans les
meilleures conditions possible (base juridique: art. 6 al. 1 let. f RGPD).
Ce service d’analyse fourni par Google Ireland Limited, Irlande, et Google LLC, États-Unis (collectivement
dénommées
«
Google
») utilise des cookies ou d’autres identifiants enregistrés sur votre appareil et
recueille
des données sur votre utilisation de notre site (p. ex. adresse IP / numéro d’identification, heure et durée de
l’utilisation, localisation, appareil, visite récurrente ou nouvelle, horodatage du plantage). Dans ce contexte,
des
profils d’utilisation pseudonymisés sont créés. Vous trouverez d’autres informations sur les données collectées
ici:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=fr
.
Vous pouvez empêcher l’enregistrement de cookies en paramétrant votre navigateur en ce sens. Si vous le faites,
il
se peut néanmoins que les fonctionnalités de notre site soient limitées.
Les données collectées en lien avec l’utilisation de notre site peuvent également être envoyées vers un serveur
de
Google aux États-Unis et y être conservées. La fonction «anonymiser l’IP» étant activée pour notre site, votre
adresse IP est abrégée par Google avant toute transmission au sein d’un État membre de l’Union européenne, d’un
autre signataire de l’accord sur l’Espace économique européen ou de la Suisse. Google ne transmettra
l’adresse IP
entière à l’un de ses serveurs états-uniens avant de l’abréger sur place que dans des cas exceptionnels. Google
n’associe pas l’adresse IP fournie par votre appareil à d’autres données. Google a été certifiée conforme à
l’EU-US
Data Privacy Framework et au Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Vous trouverez de plus amples informations ici:
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
.
Si vous ne souhaitez pas que Google utilise vos données, vous pouvez utiliser ce module complémentaire de
navigateur
pour désactiver Google Analytics:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=fr
.
1.7. Contenus vidéo
Nous utilisons YouTube pour la lecture des vidéos. Son utilisation est nécessaire aux fins de nos intérêts
légitimes
à mettre notre site à disposition dans les meilleures conditions possible (base juridique: art. 6 al. 1
let. f RGPD).
Les contenus vidéo sont proposés par YouTube LLC, États-Unis, une filiale de Google. Google Ireland Limited est
responsable de l’ensemble du traitement des données dans l’espace européen. Lorsque vous consultez une page de
notre
site qui intègre une vidéo YouTube, votre navigateur se connecte automatiquement aux serveurs de YouTube ou de
Google, qui peuvent également se trouver aux États-Unis. Pour ce faire, YouTube utilise au moins un cookie qui
enregistre votre adresse IP et notre URL. Si vous êtes connecté à votre compte YouTube, YouTube peut associer
vos
interactions sur notre site à votre profil à l’aide de cookies. Dans ce cadre, YouTube traite différentes
données
supplémentaires. Nous n’avons aucun contrôle sur le volume, l’usage et la durée de sauvegarde des données
collectées
par Google. Google a été certifiée conforme à l’EU-US Data Privacy Framework et au Swiss-US Data Privacy
Framework.
Vous trouverez de plus amples informations sur la protection des données sur:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
,
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=fr
et
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
.
2. Plateformes de réseaux sociaux
Nous sommes présents sur différents réseaux sociaux afin de communiquer avec les personnes intéressées et les
utilisateurs actifs sur ces réseaux et d’informer ces derniers sur Innovation 6 et TOM (base juridique: art. 6
al. 1
let. f RGPD).
Sur notre site, nous avons intégré des liens vers nos comptes en ligne sur les réseaux sociaux suivants:
Facebook;
Instagram;
LinkedIn;
YouTube.
Si vous cliquez sur les icônes correspondantes, vous serez automatiquement redirigé vers notre profil sur la
plateforme concernée. Une connexion directe est établie entre votre navigateur et les serveurs de la plateforme
en
question, qui peuvent également se trouver dans un pays tiers (p. ex. aux États-Unis). La plateforme est
informée
que vous avez visité notre site depuis votre adresse IP et que vous avez cliqué sur le lien. Si vous consultez
un
lien de ce genre alors que vous êtes connecté à votre compte sur la plateforme concernée, le contenu de notre
site
peut être associé à votre profil sur la plateforme, ce qui signifie que cette dernière peut associer votre
visite
sur notre site directement à votre compte utilisateur. Si vous souhaitez l’éviter, vous devez vous déconnecter
avant
de cliquer sur le lien correspondant. Dans tous les cas, une association a lieu lorsque vous vous connectez à la
plateforme concernée après avoir cliqué sur le lien.
Nous attirons votre attention sur le fait que vous utilisez nos pages Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn et YouTube et
leurs fonctionnalités sous votre propre responsabilité. Cela vaut en particulier pour l’utilisation des
fonctions
interactives (p. ex. commentaires, partages, réactions). Lors de leur utilisation, des données à caractère
personnel
sont collectées par les réseaux correspondants et peuvent être transférées et traitées dans des pays situés en
dehors de la Suisse et de l’Union européenne.
Nous ne savons pas quelles informations Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn et YouTube collectent et traitent. Pour une
présentation détaillée des différents traitements et des possibilités d’opposition (opt-out), nous vous
renvoyons
aux informations de ces prestataires accessible en cliquant sur les liens suivants.
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
Instagram:
https://privacycenter.instagram.com/policy/
LinkedIn:
https://fr.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls
YouTube:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
3. Hébergement et maintenance
Les données collectées sont transmises au serveur cloud de notre fournisseur d’hébergement dogado GmbH, en
Allemagne,
et y sont stockées dans les bases de données d’Innovation 6. dogado GmbH, en Allemagne, ainsi que
bitsfabrik GmbH,
en Autriche, l’entreprise informatique responsable du développement et de la maintenance du site, ont accès à
ces
données dans le cadre de la fourniture de leurs services. Les prestataires n’ont accès à ces données que dans le
cadre de l’exploitation et de la maintenance du serveur, ainsi que de la maintenance, de la suppression des
erreurs
et du développement de notre site. L’utilisation de ces prestations de services est nécessaire aux fins de nos
intérêts légitimes à mettre notre site à disposition dans les meilleures conditions possible (base juridique:
art. 6
al. 1 let. f RGPD).
4. Transmission des données vers l’étranger
Comme indiqué dans la présente déclaration de confidentialité (voir points 1.6 et 3), des données sont transmises
à
des personnes ou à des entreprises à l’étranger. Les dispositions légales relatives à la communication de
données
personnelles à des tiers sont bien entendu respectées. Font partie des États vers lesquels des données sont
transmises ceux qui, conformément à la décision du Conseil fédéral (LPD) et de la Commission européenne (RGPD),
disposent d’un niveau adéquat de protection des données (p. ex. États membres de l’EEE, Suisse), mais aussi des
États (p. ex. les États-Unis) dont le niveau de protection des données n’est pas jugé approprié. Dès lors que le
pays concerné ne dispose pas d’un niveau de protection approprié des données et qu’il n’existe pas de
consentement
explicite de l’utilisateur, ni de transmission requise par contrat ou par la loi, et qu’aucune autre disposition
exceptionnelle (art. 49 RGPD) ne s’applique, nous concluons des contrats avec les clauses standard de protection
des
données mises à disposition par la Commission européenne et le Préposé fédéral à la protection des données et à
la
transparence (
PFPDT
), qui prévoient des garanties pour la protection de vos données auprès du
prestataire ou du destinataire dans un pays tiers.
Remarques concernant la transmission de données vers les États-Unis:
Sur la base de l’EU-US Data Privacy
Framework convenu avec les États-Unis et de l’Executive Order du président des États-Unis du 7 octobre 2022, la
Commission européenne a stipulé dans une décision de caractère adéquat que les États-Unis garantissent un niveau
de
protection approprié pour les données à caractère personnel. Cela ne s’applique toutefois qu’aux entreprises
américaines qui sont certifiées selon le EU-US Data Privacy Framework et qui s’engagent ainsi à respecter ses
prescriptions. Pour savoir si un prestataire de services américain auquel nous faisons appel est certifié selon
l’EU-US Data Privacy Framework, merci de consulter la présente déclaration de confidentialité. Vous trouverez la
liste de toutes les entreprises américaines certifiées ainsi que d’autres informations sur l’EU-US Data Privacy
Framework sur le site du ministère américain du Commerce, à l’adresse https://www.dataprivaxframework.gov. Les
négociations entre la Suisse et les États-Unis concernant le Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework et la
reconnaissance de
l’adéquation du niveau de protection des données ne sont pas encore terminées. Le Conseil fédéral n’a pas encore
pris sa décision à ce sujet.
5. Durée de conservation des données
Nous supprimons toutes les données à caractère personnel que nous collectons ou que vous nous transmettez lors de
votre visite sur notre site dès lors qu’elles ne sont plus nécessaires aux fins pour lesquelles elles sont
traitées
(voir également points 1.2 et 1.4) et que leur conservation n’est pas requise en vertu de dispositions légales.
6. Sécurité des données
Nous prenons des mesures de sécurité techniques et organisationnelles appropriées pour protéger vos données à
caractère personnel contre les abus et les accès illicites. En ce qui concerne les sous-traitants auxquels nous
avons recours pour fournir nos prestations, nous prenons également des mesures réglementaires appropriées pour
veiller à la protection de vos données à caractère personnel conformément aux dispositions légales pertinentes.
7. Droits en matière de protection des données
Dans le cadre de la législation sur la protection des données qui s’applique à vous et dans la mesure où elle le
prévoit, vous pouvez demander des
renseignements sur les données
vous concernant
conservées
chez nous
et avez le
droit d’obtenir vos données dans un format couramment utilisé, lisible
sur
une machine
. En outre, si la requête est justifiée, vous pouvez demander
l’effacement ou la
rectification de vos données
ainsi que
la limitation de leur traitement
, voire
vous opposer à leur traitement
ou
révoquer votre consentement relatif à leur
traitement
. Vous pouvez également faire valoir votre
droit d’introduire une réclamation
auprès
de l’autorité de contrôle compétente
.
Veuillez noter que nous nous réservons le droit de faire valoir de notre côté les limitations prévues par la
législation, par exemple lorsque nous sommes tenus de conserver ou de traiter certaines données, ou lorsque nos
intérêts prévalent.
8. Contact
Responsable:
Innovation 6 SA, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Suisse, est responsable du traitement des données sur le
site.
Si vous avez des demandes concernant la protection des données, veuillez vous adresser à Innovation 6 SA,
Support,
Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Suisse par courrier ou envoyer un e-mail à
support@tommedications.com
.
Délégué à la protection des données et représentant européen:
Vous pouvez contacter notre délégué à la protection des données et représentant européen externe aux coordonnées
suivantes:
Pascal Winnen, Hemex Germany GmbH, Wallbrunstrasse 24, 79539 Lörrach, Allemagne.
E-mail:
pascal.winnen@hemex.ch
Dichiarazione sulla protezione dei dati del sito web TOM
Innovation 6 SA, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Svizzera, iscritta nel registro di commercio del Canton
Zurigo con il numero CHE-263.807.653 (
Innovation 6
o
noi
) è il gestore del
sito
web www.tommedications.com (
sito
web
) e fornisce anche l’app per la gestione
dei
medicamenti TOM (
TOM
). Innovation 6 è il soggetto responsabile del trattamento dei dati
personali
del sito web e di TOM.
Per una migliore leggibilità utilizzeremo in seguito solo la denominazione maschile, intendendo però rivolgerci a
persone di tutti i sessi.
Per Innovation 6 la gestione corretta dei dati personali dell’utente del nostro sito web e di TOM (
utente
oppure
voi
) è molto importante. Naturalmente rispettiamo, ove applicabile, le
disposizioni
stabilite dalla Legge federale svizzera sulla protezione dei dati (LPD), dall’Ordinanza svizzera sulla
protezione
dei dati (OPDa), dal Regolamento generale UE sulla protezione dei dati (RGPD) e altre disposizioni in materia
eventualmente applicabili. A causa di un’applicazione geografica più ampia, di seguito verranno utilizzati i
termini
del RGPD. In particolare, anziché utilizzare i termini «trattamento» di «dati personali» e «interesse
preponderante»
utilizzati nella LPD, si utilizzano i termini «trattamento» di «dati personali» e «legittimo interesse»
utilizzati
nell’RGPD. Nell’ambito dell’applicazione della LPD, il significato legale dei termini continuerà tuttavia a
essere
determinato secondo la LPD.
Di seguito informiamo gli utenti in merito alla tipologia, all’entità e allo scopo del trattamento dei loro dati
personali in occasione della visita del nostro sito web. La dichiarazione sulla protezione dei dati di TOM è
disponibile qui
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung#it
.
Vi invitiamo a tenere presente che le seguenti spiegazioni possono subire occasionali adeguamenti attraverso la
pubblicazione di una versione modificata della presente dichiarazione sulla protezione dei dati. L’ultima
modifica
alla presente dichiarazione sulla protezione dei dati è stata apportata in data 23 novembre 2023.
1. Dati raccolti, finalità della raccolta e dell’utilizzo dei dati
1.1. Dati raccolti automaticamente durante la visita al nostro sito web
Durante la visita al nostro sito web vengono raccolti automaticamente i seguenti dati:
Dati relativi alle connessioni di rete e alle attività del sito web (ad es. indirizzo IP, nome e URL del file
richiesto, nome host del computer che effettua l’accesso, data e ora dell’accesso).
Informazioni tecniche relative al dispositivo finale utilizzato (ad es. produttore, modello, piattaforma,
sistema operativo).
Impostazioni relative al Paese o alla lingua.
Per motivi tecnici, il trattamento di tali dati è necessario ai fini dell’utilizzo del nostro sito web. Tale
trattamento garantisce in particolare il corretto funzionamento e ottimizza le funzionalità e la qualità della
visualizzazione del sito web. Inoltre, tali dati sono utilizzati al fine di effettuare analisi statistiche
interne
relative al comportamento degli utenti. Il trattamento si rende necessario per tutelare gli interessi legittimi
di
Innovation 6 (principio giuridico: art. 6 par. 1 lett. f RGPD).
1.2. Cookie
Utilizziamo inoltre cookie per rendere all’utente più semplice e gradevole la visita del nostro sito web (cfr.
anche
il punto1.6). I cookie sono file di testo che il vostro browser salva automaticamente sul vostro dispositivo
quando
visitate il nostro sito web. Si impiegano cookie di sessione che vengono cancellati nuovamente dopo ogni visita
del
nostro sito web, ma anche cookie permanenti, memorizzati dopo la fine della sessione del browser per una certa
durata e finalizzati al riconoscimento dell’utente. Qualora ciò sia necessario per legge, richiediamo il vostro
consenso all’utilizzo dei cookie (principio giuridico: art. 6 par. 1 lett. a e f RGPD).
Configurando adeguatamente il vostro browser, potete impedire che i cookie vengano memorizzati sul vostro
dispositivo. Tuttavia, ciò può avere come conseguenza l’impossibilità di usare alcune funzioni del nostro sito
web.
Sul nostro sito web utilizziamo i seguenti cookie:
_ga
Fornitore del cookie: Google Analytics
Durata: 2 anni
Funzione: Google Analytics utilizza questo cookie per identificare in modo univoco gli utenti.
_gid
Fornitore del cookie: Google Analytics
Durata: 24 ore
Funzione: Google Analytics utilizza questo cookie per identificare in modo univoco gli utenti.
_gat
Fornitore del cookie: Google Analytics
Durata: 1 minuto
Funzione: Questo cookie viene impostato per limitare il numero di richieste ai server di Google in un determinato
periodo di tempo.
wp-wpml_current_language
Fornitore del cookie: tom medications
Durata: 1 giorno
Funzione: Questo cookie serve a memorizzare l’impostazione della lingua.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Fornitore del cookie: YouTube
Durata: 6 mesi
Funzione: Per consentire la pubblicazione di annunci o il retargeting, memorizzare e monitorare l’identità di un
visitatore e le interazioni.
YSC
Fornitore del cookie: YouTube
Durata: Sessione
Funzione: Per memorizzare e tracciare le interazioni.
511
Fornitore del cookie: Google
Durata: 6 mesi
Funzione: Servizio di autenticazione.
AEC
Fornitore del cookie: Google
Durata: 6 mesi
Funzione: Il cookie assicura che le richieste vengano effettuate dall’utente all’interno di una sessione di
navigazione e non da altri siti web.
SOCS
Fornitore del cookie: Google
Durata: 30 giorni
Funzione: Serve a memorizzare le decisioni relative ai cookie.
CONSENT
Fornitore del cookie: Google
Durata: 1 anno
Funzione: Serve a memorizzare le decisioni relative ai cookie.
c
Fornitore del cookie: LinkedIn
Durata: 6 mesi
Funzione: Serve per l’autenticazione e il tracciamento.
bcookie
Fornitore del cookie: LinkedIn
Durata: 1 anno
Funzione: Questo cookie di identificazione del browser viene utilizzato a scopi diagnostici.
li_sugr
Fornitore del cookie: LinkedIn
Durata: 3 mesi
Funzione: Questo cookie viene utilizzato per determinare corrispondenze probabilistiche dell’identità di un
utente al
di fuori dei Paesi designati.
AnalyticsSyncHistory
Fornitore del cookie: LinkedIn
Durata: 1 mese
Funzione: Questo cookie memorizza quando è avvenuta una sincronizzazione con il cookie «lms_analytics cookie».
UserMatchHistory
Fornitore del cookie: LinkedIn
Durata: 1 mese
Funzione: Questo cookie serve a sincronizzare gli ID di LinkedIn Ads.
lidc
Fornitore del cookie: LinkedIn
Durata: 1 giorno
Funzione: Questo cookie consente di selezionare il centro dati.
1.3. Utilizzo del modulo di contatto
Se l’utente ci contatta tramite il modulo di contatto sul nostro sito web, raccogliamo i seguenti dati:
Nome e cognome (e-mail aziendale)
Indirizzo e-mail
Numero di telefono
Messaggio
Suddetti dati sono quindi da noi utilizzati al fine di elaborare le vostre richieste e rispondere alle vostre
domande
(principio giuridico: art. 6 par. 1 lett. a RGPD).
1.4. Possibilità di inserimento dei farmaci
Sul nostro sito web è possibile registrare il piano di assunzione dei medicinali, la dose giornaliera e l’orario
dell’assunzione. Per supportarvi, sono disponibili diversi database dei farmaci specifici per i paesi
finalizzati ad
agevolarne il riconoscimento. Per riconoscere quale sia il database dei medicinali o il Paese applicabile, si
utilizzano le impostazioni relative al Paese e alla lingua presenti sul vostro browser e, in caso di eventuali
problemi, l’indirizzo IP (principio giuridico: art. 6 par. 1 lett. b RGPD).
I dati da voi registrati possono essere trasmessi a TOM scansionando con TOM il codice QR visualizzato sul sito
web
in cui i vostri dati sono codificati in formato digitale. Il codice QR non contiene alcun meccanismo di
tracciamento. Se non utilizzate ancora TOM, dovete prima installare TOM sul vostro dispositivo mobile. Per le
informazioni sulla registrazione e l’utilizzo dei vostri dati in TOM, rimandiamo alla dichiarazione sulla
protezione
dei dati di TOM.
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung#it
Dopo la trasmissione dei dati a TOM o qualora decidiate di non trasmettere a TOM le informazioni inserite, sia le
informazioni inserite che il codice QR verranno cancellati dal sito web. Sul nostro sito web tali informazioni
non
vengono salvate né archiviate.
1.5. Utilizzo di link esterni integrati
Tramite i link esterni integrati nel nostro sito web verrete reindirizzati al sito web di terzi (ad es. Google
Play
Store, Apple App Store, social network, servizi di messaggistica istantanea come WhatsApp o Telegram).
Innovation 6
non ha alcun controllo sui dati raccolti e sulle operazioni di trattamento dei dati effettuate da terzi e non ne
è
responsabile. Vi invitiamo a informarvi su come vengono trattati i vostri dati.
1.6. Tool di analisi
Il nostro sito web utilizza il servizio di analisi Google Analytics (GA4). Le analisi sull’utilizzo del nostro
sito
web servono a stabilizzare e migliorare il nostro sito web e a generare rapporti sulle interruzioni. L’utilizzo
del
servizio di analisi avviene al fine di tutelare i nostri interessi legittimi legati a una disponibilità ottimale
del
nostro sito web (principio giuridico: art. 6 par. 1 lett. f RGPD).
Questo servizio di analisi fornito da Google Ireland Limited, Irlanda, e Google LLC, Stati Uniti (congiuntamente
Google
) utilizza cookie o altri identificatori che vengono memorizzati sul vostro dispositivo e
che
forniscono dati sul vostro utilizzo del nostro sito web (ad es. indirizzo IP/identificativo, ora e durata
dell’utilizzo, posizione, terminale, visite ricorrenti o nuove, marcatura temporale del crash). In questo
contesto
vengono creati profili utente pseudonimizzati. Ulteriori informazioni in merito ai dati registrati sono
disponibili
qui:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=it&sjid=4672195936899478302-EU
.
L’utente può impedire la memorizzazione dei cookie con la rispettiva impostazione del proprio browser. Tuttavia,
ciò
può comportare l’impossibilità di usare alcune funzioni del nostro sito web.
I dati registrati con riferimento al vostro utilizzo del nostro sito web possono essere eventualmente trasmessi a
un
server Google negli USA, in cui vengono quindi memorizzati. Dal momento che per il nostro sito web è attiva la
funzione di anonimizzazione dell’IP, prima di procedere alla trasmissione all’interno degli Stati membri
dell’Unione
Europea o in altri Stati aderenti all’Accordo sullo Spazio economico europeo oppure in Svizzera, Google abbrevia
l’indirizzo IP dell’utente. Solo in casi eccezionali Google trasmette l’indirizzo IP completo a un server Google
negli USA abbreviandolo quindi al suo interno. Google non associa ad altri dati l’indirizzo IP trasmesso dal
vostro
dispositivo finale. Google è certificato ai sensi del Data Privacy Framework UE-USA e dello Swiss-USA Data
Privacy
Framework. Ulteriori informazioni sono disponibili qui:
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/.
Se non desiderate che Google utilizzi i vostri dati, potete utilizzare il seguente add-on del browser per
disattivare
Google:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=it
.
1.7. Contenuti video
Per la riproduzione di video ci affidiamo a YouTube. L’utilizzo avviene al fine di tutelare i nostri interessi
legittimi legati a una disponibilità ottimale delle funzioni del nostro sito web (principio giuridico: art. 6
par. 1
lett. f RGPD).
I contenuti video sono offerti da YouTube LLC, USA, una società affiliata di Google. Google Ireland Limited è
responsabile di tutto il trattamento dei dati nell’area europea. Quando l’utente visita una pagina del nostro
sito
web che contiene un video YouTube, il suo browser si collega automaticamente ai server di YouTube o Google che
possono trovarsi anche negli Stati Uniti. YouTube utilizza almeno un cookie che memorizza il vostro indirizzo IP
e
il nostro URL. Se avete effettuato l’accesso al vostro account YouTube, YouTube può associare le vostre
interazioni
sul nostro sito web al vostro profilo utilizzando i cookie. In questo contesto, YouTube elabora diversi dati
aggiuntivi. Non abbiamo alcun controllo sull’entità, sull’utilizzo e sulla durata dell’archiviazione dei dati
rilevati da Google. Google è certificato ai sensi del Data Privacy Framework UE-USA e dello Swiss-USA Data
Privacy
Framework. Ulteriori informazioni sulla protezione dei dati sono disponibili su:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
;
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=it
e
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
.
2. Piattaforme di social media
Gestiamo presenze online su diversi social network per comunicare con gli interessati e gli utenti lì attivi e
per
informarli su Innovation 6 e TOM (principio giuridico: art. 6 par. 1 lett. f RGPD).
Sul nostro sito web abbiamo inserito dei link alla nostra presenza online sui seguenti social network:
Facebook,
Instagram,
LinkedIn,
YouTube
Cliccando sulle icone in questione verrete automaticamente reindirizzati al nostro profilo sulla piattaforma
interessata. In tal caso viene stabilita una connessione diretta tra il vostro browser e i server della relativa
piattaforma che possono trovarsi anche in un Paese terzo (ad es. gli Stati Uniti). La piattaforma riceve
l’informazione che avete visitato il nostro sito web con il vostro indirizzo IP e che avete utilizzato il link.
Se
accedete a un tale link mentre siete connessi al vostro account sulla piattaforma interessata, i contenuti della
nostra pagina possono essere collegati al vostro profilo sulla piattaforma. Ciò significa che la piattaforma può
associare direttamente la vostra visita al nostro sito web al vostro account utente. Per evitare che ciò accada,
dovreste effettuare il logout prima di accedere al link corrispondente. L’associazione avviene comunque quando,
dopo
aver utilizzato il link, effettuate l’accesso alla relativa piattaforma.
Desideriamo sottolineare che l’utilizzo delle nostre pagine Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn e YouTube e delle loro
funzioni avviene sotto la vostra responsabilità. Ciò vale in particolare per l’utilizzo delle funzioni
interattive
(ad es. commenti, condivisioni, valutazioni). Nell’ambito di tale utilizzo, i dati personali verranno raccolti
dai
rispettivi network e potrebbero essere trasferiti in Paesi al di fuori della Svizzera e dell’Unione Europea,
dove
saranno elaborati.
Non siamo a conoscenza di quali informazioni Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn e YouTube raccolgono ed elaborano. Per
una
descrizione dettagliata del rispettivo trattamento e delle possibilità di opposizione (opt-out) rimandiamo ai
seguenti link di detti fornitori.
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/.
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads.
Instagram:
https://privacycenter.instagram.com/policy/.
LinkedIn:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy.
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls.
YouTube
https://policies.google.com/privacy.
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms.
3. Hosting e manutenzione
I dati raccolti vengono trasmessi al server cloud del nostro fornitore di servizi di hosting dogado GmbH, con
sede in
Germania, e ivi memorizzati nelle banche dati di Innovation 6. dogado GmbH, in Germania, e la società
informatica
bitsfabrik GmbH, in Austria, responsabile dello sviluppo e della manutenzione del sito web, hanno accesso a tali
dati nell’ambito della fornitura dei loro servizi. Tali società fornitrici dei servizi accedono a tali dati
esclusivamente con riferimento alla gestione e alla manutenzione del server e alla manutenzione, risoluzione dei
problemi e agli ulteriori sviluppi nel nostro sito web. L’utilizzo di tali servizi avviene al fine di tutelare i
nostri interessi legittimi legati a una disponibilità ottimale del nostro sito web (principio giuridico: art. 6
par.
1 lett. f RGPD).
4. Trasmissione di dati all’estero
Come menzionato nella presente dichiarazione sulla protezione dei dati (cfr. punti 1.6 e 3), i dati sono
trasmessi a
persone o aziende all’estero, naturalmente nel rispetto delle disposizioni di legge in materia di comunicazione
dei
dati personali a terzi. Tra gli Stati in cui vengono trasmessi i dati rientrano quelli che, ai sensi della
decisione
del Consiglio federale (LPD) e della Commissione dell’UE (RGPD) hanno un livello adeguato di protezione dei dati
(ad
esempio gli Stati membri del SEE, la Svizzera), ma anche gli Stati (ad esempio gli Stati Uniti) il cui livello
di
protezione dei dati non è considerato adeguato. Se il Paese in questione non ha un livello adeguato di
protezione
dei dati e in assenza di un consenso esplicito dell’utente, se non c’è un trasferimento richiesto per contratto
o
per legge e non si applicano altre disposizioni derogatorie (art. 49 RGPD), stipuliamo contratti con le clausole
standard di protezione dei dati fornite dalla Commissione europea e dall’Incaricato federale della protezione
dei
dati e della trasparenza (
IFPDT
), che forniscono garanzie per la protezione dei vostri dati
presso
il fornitore di servizi o il destinatario nel Paese terzo.
Indicazioni sui trasferimenti di dati negli Stati Uniti:
Sulla base del Data Privacy Framework UE-USA
concordato con gli Stati Uniti e dell’Executive Order emanato dal Presidente degli Stati Uniti il 7 ottobre
2022, la
Commissione UE ha stabilito in una decisione di adeguatezza che gli Stati Uniti garantiscono un livello adeguato
di
protezione dei dati personali. Ciò vale tuttavia solo per le aziende statunitensi che si certificano secondo il
Data
Privacy Framework UE-USA e si impegnano quindi a rispettare le disposizioni dello stesso. La presente
dichiarazione
sulla protezione dei dati vi informa se un fornitore di servizi statunitense da noi coinvolto ha ottenuto o meno
la
certificazione ai sensi del Data Privacy Framework UE-USA. Potete trovare l’elenco di tutte le aziende
statunitensi
certificate e ulteriori informazioni sul Data Privacy Framework UE-USA sul sito web del Ministero del Commercio
USA
all’indirizzo https;//www.dataprivaxframework.gov. Le trattative tra la Svizzera e gli Stati Uniti in relazione
allo
Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework e al riconoscimento dell’adeguatezza del livello di protezione dei dati non sono
ancora concluse. La relativa decisione del Consiglio federale è ancora in sospeso.
5. Durata di conservazione dei dati
Tutti i dati personali che raccogliamo durante la vostra visita al nostro sito web o che ci trasmettete vengono
cancellati non appena non sono più necessari per lo scopo per cui sono stati trattati (cfr. anche punti 1.2 e
1.4) e
a meno che la conservazione non sia richiesta da disposizioni di legge.
6. Sicurezza dei dati
Adottiamo adeguate misure precauzionali a livello tecnico e organizzativo volte a proteggere i dati personali
dell’utente da accessi non autorizzati e eventuali abusi. Con riferimento ai subappaltatori da noi impiegati, al
fine di rendere disponibili le nostre prestazioni, ricorriamo inoltre ad adeguate misure preventive a livello
legale
con l’obiettivo di provvedere alla protezione dei dati personali dell’utente sulla base delle disposizioni
legislative pertinenti.
7. Diritti in materia di protezione dei dati
Nell’ambito del diritto a voi applicabile a livello di protezione dei dati e nella misura in cui questo lo
preveda,
potete richiedere informazioni in merito ai vostri dati da noi conservati
e avete il
diritto di ricevere i vostri dati in un formato standard leggibile da dispositivi automatici
.
Inoltre, in casi giustificati potete richiedere la
cancellazione o la rettifica dei vostri
dati
,
nonché la
limitazione del relativo trattamento
. Avete inoltre la facoltà di
opporvi al
trattamento dei vostri dati
o di
revocare il consenso al trattamento
. Vi spetta
inoltre il
diritto di presentare reclamo presso l’autorità di controllo competente
.
Vi ricordiamo che ci riserviamo la facoltà di far valere le limitazioni previste per legge, ad esempio nel caso
in
cui fossimo obbligati a conservare o a trattare determinati dati o nel caso in cui avessimo un interesse
prevalente
in tal senso.
8. Contatto
Organo competente:
Responsabile del trattamento dei dati del sito web è Innovation 6 SA, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil,
Svizzera.
Per qualsiasi questione relativa alla protezione dei dati vi preghiamo di rivolgervi via e-mail a
support@tommedications.com
o di scrivere una lettera a
Innovation 6
SA, Support, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Svizzera.
Incaricato della protezione dei dati e rappresentante UE:
Potete raggiungere il nostro incaricato esterno per la protezione dei dati e il rappresentante UE al seguente
indirizzo:
Pascal Winnen, Hemex Germany GmbH, Wallbrunstrasse 24, 79539 Lörrach, Germania.
E-mail:
pascal.winnen@hemex.ch
Privacyverklaring TOM Website
Innovation 6 AG, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Zwitserland, geregistreerd in het handelsregister van het
kanton Zürich onder nummer CHE-263.807.653 (
Innovation 6
of
wij
) beheert de
website www.tommedications.com (
Website
) en biedt ook de Geneesmiddelen-management-app TOM
(
TOM
) aan. Innovation 6 is de verantwoordelijke voor de verwerking van persoonsgegevens van de
Website en TOM.
Voor de leesbaarheid gebruiken wij hieronder telkens alleen de mannelijke vorm, maar daarmee bedoelen wij
personen
van alle geslachten.
Innovation 6 hecht bijzonder veel belang aan de juiste omgang met de persoonsgegevens van de gebruiker van onze
Website en van TOM (
Gebruiker
of
u
). Vanzelfsprekend houden wij ons, voor
zover
van toepassing, aan de bepalingen van de Zwitserse federale wet inzake de bescherming van persoonsgegevens
(DSG), de
Zwitserse Verordening Gegevensbescherming (DSV) en de Algemene Verordening Gegevensbescherming (AVG) van de EU
en
andere toepasselijke bepalingen inzake gegevensbescherming. Vanwege de bredere geografische toepassing worden
hierna
de begrippen van de AVG gebruikt. In het bijzonder worden in plaats van de in de AVG gebruikte termen
“verwerking”
van “persoonsgegevens” en “overwegend belang” de in de AVG gebruikte termen “verwerking” van “persoonsgegevens”
en
“rechtmatig belang” gebruikt. De juridische betekenis van de begrippen wordt echter in het kader van de
werkingssfeer van de DSG nog steeds bepaald door de DSG.
Hieronder informeren wij u over de aard, de omvang en het doel van de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens, wanneer
u
onze Website bezoekt. De privacyverklaring van TOM vindt u hier
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung#nl
.
Houd er rekening mee dat de volgende uitvoeringen in voorkomende gevallen kunnen worden gewijzigd door het
publiceren
van een gewijzigde versie van deze privacyverklaring. Deze privacyverklaring is voor het laatst gewijzigd op 23
november 2023.
1. Verzamelde gegevens, doel van verzameling en gebruik van de gegevens
1.1 Gegevens die automatisch worden verzameld, wanneer u onze Website bezoekt
Wanneer u onze Website bezoekt, worden automatisch de volgende gegevens verzameld:
Gegevens over netwerkverbindingen en Website-activiteiten (bijv. IP-adres, naam en URL van het aangevraagde
bestand, hostnaam van de computer die toegang heeft, datum en tijd van toegang).
Apparaatgegevens van het gebruikte eindapparaat (bijv. fabrikant, model, platform, besturingssysteem).
Regio- of taalinstellingen.
De verwerking van deze gegevens is om technische redenen noodzakelijk voor het gebruik van onze Website. Het
waarborgt in het bijzonder de goede werking en optimaliseert de functionaliteit en de weergavekwaliteit van de
Website. Bovendien worden deze gegevens gebruikt voor interne statistische evaluaties van het gebruikersgedrag.
De
verwerking is vereist voor de behartiging van de rechtmatige belangen van Innovation 6 (rechtsgrondslag: Art. 6
Alinea 1 lit. f AVG).
1.2. Cookies
Wij gebruiken ook cookies om uw bezoek aan onze Website gemakkelijker en prettiger vorm te geven (zie ook
paragraaf
‎1.6). Cookies zijn tekstbestanden die uw webbrowser automatisch op uw eindapparaat opslaat, wanneer u onze
Website
bezoekt. Er worden sessiecookies gebruikt, die na elk bezoek aan onze Website weer worden gewist, of permanente
cookies die na beëindiging van de browsersessie voor een bepaalde duur worden opgeslagen en zijn bedoeld om de
Gebruiker te herkennen. Indien wettelijk vereist, vragen wij uw voorafgaande toestemming voor het gebruik van
cookies (rechtsgrond: Art. 6 Alinea 1 lit a en f AVG).
U kunt voorkomen dat cookies op uw eindapparaat worden opgeslagen door uw webbrowser dienovereenkomstig te
configureren. Dit kan er echter toe leiden dat u niet alle functionaliteiten van onze Website kunt gebruiken.
Op onze Website gebruiken wij de volgende cookies:
_ga
Aanbieder van cookies: Google Analytics
Levensduur: 2 jaar
Functie: Google Analytics plaatst deze cookie om Gebruikers op uniforme wijze te identificeren.
_gid
Aanbieder van cookies: Google Analytics
Levensduur: 24 uur
Functie: Google Analytics plaatst deze cookie om Gebruikers op uniforme wijze te identificeren.
_gat
Aanbieder van cookies: Google Analytics
Levensduur: 1 minuut
Functie: Deze cookie wordt ingesteld om het aantal aanvragen aan Google-servers binnen een bepaalde periode te
begrenzen.
wp-wpml_current_language
Aanbieder van cookies: TOM medications
Levensduur: 1 dag
Functie: Deze cookie wordt gebruikt om de taalinstelling op te slaan.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Aanbieder van cookies: YouTube
Levensduur: 6 maanden
Functie: Om advertentieweergave of retargeting mogelijk te maken, de identiteit van een bezoeker en interacties
op te
slaan en te volgen.
YSC
Aanbieder van cookies: YouTube
Levensduur: Sessie
Functie: Om interacties op te slaan en te volgen.
511
Aanbieder van cookies: Google
Levensduur: 6 maanden
Functie: Dienst voor verificatie.
AEC
Aanbieder van cookies: Google
Levensduur: 6 maanden
Functie: De cookie zorgt ervoor dat de aanvragen binnen een browsersessie door de Gebruiker worden gedaan en niet
door andere websites.
SOCS
Aanbieder van cookies: Google
Levensduur: 30 dagen
Functie: Wordt gebruikt voor het opslaan van cookie-beslissingen.
CONSENT
Aanbieder van cookies: Google
Levensduur: 1 jaar
Functie: Wordt gebruikt voor het opslaan van cookie-beslissingen.
c
Aanbieder van cookies: LinkedIn
Levensduur: 6 maanden
Functie: Dient voor verificatie en tracking.
bcookie
Aanbieder van cookies: LinkedIn
Levensduur: 1 jaar
Functie: Deze cookie voor browseridentificatie wordt gebruikt voor diagnostische doeleinden.
li_sugr
Aanbieder van cookies: LinkedIn
Levensduur: 3 maanden
Functie: Deze cookie wordt gebruikt om theoretische waarschijnlijkheidsovereenkomsten van de identiteit van een
Gebruiker buiten de aangewezen landen vast te stellen.
AnalyticsSyncHistory
Aanbieder van cookies: LinkedIn
Levensduur: 1 maand
Functie: Deze cookie wordt gebruikt om op te slaan, wanneer een synchronisatie met de cookie “lms_analytics
cookie”
heeft plaatsgevonden.
UserMatchHistory
Aanbieder van cookies: LinkedIn
Levensduur: 1 maand
Functie: Deze cookie wordt gebruikt om de ID’s van LinkedIn Ads te synchroniseren.
lidc
Aanbieder van cookies: LinkedIn
Levensduur: 1 dag
Functie: Deze cookie zorgt voor de selectie van het datacenter.
1.3. Gebruik van het contactformulier
Als u contact met ons opneemt via het contactformulier op onze Website, verzamelen wij de volgende gegevens:
Voor- en achternaam (bedrijfs-e-mail)
E-mailadres
Telefoonnummer
Uw bericht
Deze gegevens worden door ons gebruikt om uw verzoek te behandelen en uw aanvraag te beantwoorden
(rechtsgrondslag:
Art. 6 Alinea 1 lit. a AVG).
1.4. Mogelijkheid om geneesmiddelen in te voeren
Op onze Website is het mogelijk om het medicatieschema alsmede de dagelijkse dosering en het tijdstip van inname
van
deze geneesmiddelen te registreren. Om u te helpen zijn er verschillende landspecifieke geneesmiddelendatabases
beschikbaar om de identificatie van geneesmiddelen te vergemakkelijken. Om de toepasselijke
geneesmiddelendatabase
of het toepasselijke land te identificeren, worden de regio- en taalinstellingen van uw webbrowser en, in geval
van
problemen, het IP-adres gebruikt (rechtsgrond: Art. 6 Alinea 1 lit. b AVG).
U kunt de door u geregistreerde gegevens aan TOM overdragen door de QR-code die op de Website wordt weergegeven
en
waarin uw gegevens digitaal zijn gecodeerd, met TOM te scannen. De QR-code bevat geen trackingmechanisme. Als u
TOM
nog niet gebruikt, moet u TOM eerst installeren op uw mobiele apparaat. Voor informatie over het registreren en
gebruiken van uw gegevens in TOM verwijzen wij u naar de privacyverklaring van TOM.
https://www.tommedications.com/datenschutzerklaerung#nl
Na de overdracht van de gegevens aan TOM of als u ervoor kiest om de ingevoerde gegevens niet aan TOM over te
dragen,
worden zowel deze als de QR-code op de Website gewist. Op onze Website worden deze gegevens niet opgeslagen of
gearchiveerd.
1.5. Oproepen van opgenomen externe links
Via externe links op onze Website wordt u doorgestuurd naar de website van derden (bijv. Google Play Store, Apple
App
Store, sociale netwerken, sms-diensten, zoals WhatsApp of Telegram). Innovation 6 heeft geen invloed op en is
niet
verantwoordelijk voor de verzamelde gegevens en de gegevensverwerkingsprocedures van deze derden. Informeer bij
hen
over de omgang met uw gegevens.
1.6. Analysetool
Onze Website maakt gebruik van de analysedienst Google Analytics (GA4). De analyses van het gebruik van onze
Website
zijn bedoeld om onze Website te stabiliseren en te verbeteren en om crash-rapporten op te stellen. Het gebruik
van
de analysedienst vindt plaats ter bescherming van onze rechtmatige belangen bij de best mogelijke
beschikbaarstelling van onze Website (rechtsgrond: Art. 6 Alinea 1 lit. f AVG).
Deze analysedienst van Google Ireland Limited, Ierland en Google LLC, VS (gezamenlijk
Google
),
maakt
gebruik van cookies of andere identificatiemiddelen die op uw eindapparaat worden opgeslagen en gegevens over uw
gebruik van onze Website te verzamelen (bijv. IP-adres/code, tijdstip en duur van het gebruik, locatie,
eindapparaat, herhalings- of nieuw bezoek, tijdstempel van de crash). In dit verband worden gepseudonimiseerde
gebruiksprofielen aangemaakt. Meer informatie over de geregistreerde gegevens vindt u hier:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=de
.
U kunt het opslaan van cookies voorkomen door uw webbrowser dienovereenkomstig in te stellen. Dit kan er echter
toe
leiden dat u niet alle functionaliteiten van onze Website kunt gebruiken.
De met betrekking tot uw gebruik van onze Website geregistreerde gegevens kunnen eventueel ook naar een server
van
Google in de VS worden overgedragen en daar worden opgeslagen. Aangezien de functie “IP-anonimiseren” voor onze
Website is geactiveerd, wordt uw IP-adres eerst door Google afgekort vóór de overdracht binnen de lidstaten van
de
Europese Unie of andere landen die zijn aangesloten bij het verdrag betreffende de Europese Economische Ruimte
resp.
Zwitserland. Alleen in uitzonderlijke gevallen draagt Google het volledige IP-adres over aan een server van
Google
in de VS en kort het daar in. Google combineert het door uw eindapparaat verzonden IP-adres niet met andere
gegevens. Google is gecertificeerd volgens het EU-US Data Privacy Framework (adequaatheidsbesluit voor doorgifte
van
persoonsgegevens naar de VS) en het Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Meer gegevens vindt u hier:
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
.
Als u niet wilt dat Google uw gegevens gebruikt, kunt u de volgende browser-add-on gebruiken om Google te
deactiveren:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
.
1.7. Video-inhoud
Voor het afspelen van video’s maken wij gebruik van YouTube. Het gebruik vindt plaats ter bescherming van onze
rechtmatige belangen bij de best mogelijke beschikbaarstelling van onze Website (rechtsgrond: Art. 6 Alinea 1
lit. f
AVG).
Video-inhoud wordt aangeboden door YouTube LLC, VS, een dochteronderneming van Google. Google Ireland Limited is
verantwoordelijk voor alle gegevensverwerking in de Europese Ruimte. Wanneer u een pagina van onze Website
oproept
die een YouTube-video heeft ingesloten, brengt uw browser automatisch de verbinding tot stand met de servers van
YouTube resp. Google, die zich ook in de VS kunnen bevinden. YouTube plaatst ten minste één cookie die uw
IP-adres
en onze URL opslaat. Wanneer u bent ingelogd op uw YouTube-account, kan YouTube uw interacties op onze Website
met
behulp van cookies aan uw profiel toewijzen. Daarbij worden door YouTube verschillende aanvullende gegevens
verwerkt. Wij hebben geen invloed op de omvang, het gebruik en de opslagduur van de door Google verzamelde
gegevens.
Google is gecertificeerd volgens het EU-US Data Privacy Framework (adequaatheidsbesluit voor doorgifte van
persoonsgegevens naar de VS) en het Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Meer informatie over gegevensbescherming
vindt
u op:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
;
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
en
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
.
2. Sociale media platformen
Wij onderhouden de onlineaanwezigheid op verschillende sociale netwerken om te communiceren met belangstellenden
en
Gebruikers die daar actief zijn, en om hen te informeren over Innovation 6 en TOM (rechtsgrondslag: Art. 6
Alinea 1
lit. f AVG).
Op onze Website hebben wij links opgenomen naar onze onlineaanwezigheid op de volgende sociale netwerken:
Facebook,
Instagram,
LinkedIn,
YouTube.
Wanneer u op de betreffende pictogrammen klikt, wordt u automatisch doorgestuurd naar ons profiel op dat
platform.
Daarbij wordt een directe verbinding tot stand gebracht tussen uw webbrowser en de servers van het betreffende
platform, die zich ook in een derde land (bijvoorbeeld de VS) kunnen bevinden. Het platform ontvangt de
informatie
dat u met uw IP-adres onze Website hebt bezocht en de link hebt opgeroepen. Wanneer u een dergelijke link
oproept,
terwijl u bent ingelogd op uw account op het betreffende platform, kan de inhoud van onze pagina aan uw profiel
op
het platform worden gekoppeld, wat betekent dat het platform uw bezoek aan onze Website rechtstreeks aan uw
gebruikersaccount kan toewijzen. Wanneer u dat wilt voorkomen, dient u uit te loggen, voordat u de betreffende
link
oproept. Een toewijzing vindt in elk geval plaats, wanneer u na het oproepen van de link op het betreffende
platform
inlogt.
Wij wijzen u erop dat u onze Facebook-, Instagram-, LinkedIn- en YouTube-pagina’s alsmede hun functies op eigen
verantwoordelijkheid gebruikt. Dit geldt in het bijzonder voor het gebruik van interactieve functies (bijv.
commentaar geven, delen, beoordelen). Bij dit gebruik worden persoonsgegevens verzameld door de respectieve
netwerken, die eventueel worden overgedragen aan en verwerkt in landen buiten Zwitserland en de Europese Unie.
Welke gegevens Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn en YouTube verzamelen en verwerken, is ons niet bekend. Voor een
gedetailleerde weergave van de respectieve verwerkingen en de mogelijkheden om bezwaar te maken (opt-out),
verwijzen
wij naar de hierna gekoppelde gegevens van deze aanbieders.
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
Instagram:
https://privacycenter.instagram.com/policy/
LinkedIn:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls
YouTube:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
3. Hosting en onderhoud
De verzamelde gegevens worden aan de cloud-server van onze hosting-dienstverlener, dogado GmbH, in Duitsland
overgedragen en daar in databases van Innovation 6 opgeslagen. dogado GmbH, in Duitsland, alsmede het IT-bedrijf
bitsfabrik GmbH, in Oostenrijk, dat verantwoordelijk is voor de ontwikkeling en het onderhoud van de Website,
hebben
toegang tot deze gegevens in verband met de verlening van hun diensten. De dienstverleners hebben alleen toegang
tot
deze gegevens in verband met de werking en het onderhoud van de server alsmede het onderhoud, het oplossen van
problemen en de doorontwikkeling van onze Website. Het gebruik van deze diensten vindt plaats ter bescherming
van
onze rechtmatige belangen bij de best mogelijke beschikbaarstelling van onze Website (rechtsgrond: Art. 6 Alinea
1
lit. f AVG).
4. Overdracht van gegevens naar het buitenland
Zoals in deze privacyverklaring is vermeld (vgl. paragraaf 1.6 en 3) vindt een overdracht van gegevens aan
personen
of ondernemingen in het buitenland plaats. Hierbij worden vanzelfsprekend de wettelijke voorschriften voor de
bekendmaking van persoonsgegevens aan derden nageleefd. De landen waaraan gegevens worden overgedragen, omvatten
landen die conform het besluit van de Federale Raad (DSG) en de Europese Commissie (AVG) over een passend niveau
van
gegevensbescherming beschikken (bijv. lidstaten van de EER, Zwitserland), maar ook landen (bijv. de VS) waarvan
het
niveau van gegevensbescherming niet als adequaat wordt beoordeeld. Voor zover het betreffende land geen adequaat
niveau van gegevensbescherming heeft en er geen uitdrukkelijke toestemming van de Gebruiker is, er geen
contractuele
of wettelijk vereiste doorgave bestaat en er geen andere uitzonderingsbepaling van toepassing is (Art. 49 AVG),
sluiten wij contracten met de door de Europese Commissie en de Zwitserse toezichthouder voor gegevensbescherming
en
publiciteit (
EDÖB
) beschikbaar gestelde standaardbepalingen inzake gegevensbescherming die
garanties voorzien voor de bescherming van uw gegevens bij de dienstverlener of ontvanger in het derde land.
Informatie over gegevensoverdracht naar de VS:
Op grond van het met de VS overeengekomen EU-VS Data
Privacy
Framework (adequaatheidsbesluit voor doorgifte van persoonsgegevens naar de VS) en de Executive Order van de
president van de VS d.d. 7 oktober 2022 heeft de Europese Commissie in een adequaatheidsbesluit bepaald dat de
Verenigde Staten een passend beschermingsniveau voor persoonsgegevens waarborgen. Dit is echter alleen van
toepassing op Amerikaanse bedrijven die zijn gecertificeerd volgens het EU-VS Data Privacy Framework en zich
daarmee
binden tot naleving van de richtlijnen ervan. Informatie over de vraag of een door ons ingeschakelde Amerikaanse
dienstverlener volgens het EU-VS Data Privacy Framework is gecertificeerd, vindt u in deze privacyverklaring.
Een
lijst van alle gecertificeerde Amerikaanse bedrijven en meer informatie over het EU-VS Data Privacy Framework
zijn
beschikbaar op de Website van het Amerikaanse Ministerie van Handel op https://www.dataprivaxframework.gov. De
onderhandelingen tussen Zwitserland en de VS over het Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework en de erkenning van het
adequate niveau van gegevensbescherming zijn nog niet afgerond. De Bondsraad heeft hierover nog geen besluit
genomen.
5. Duur van de opslag van de gegevens
Alle persoonsgegevens die wij tijdens uw bezoek aan onze Website verzamelen of die u aan ons verstrekt, worden
door
ons gewist, zodra deze voor het doel waarvoor ze worden verwerkt, niet langer nodig zijn (vgl. ook paragraaf
‎1.2 en
paragraaf ‎1.4) en waarvan de bewaring op grond van wettelijke bepalingen niet is vereist.
6. Gegevensbeveiliging
Wij nemen passende technische en organisatorische veiligheidsmaatregelen om uw persoonsgegevens te beschermen
tegen
ongeoorloofde toegang en misbruik. Met betrekking tot onderaannemers die wij gebruiken om onze diensten
beschikbaar
te stellen, nemen wij ook passende wettelijke voorzorgsmaatregelen om ervoor te zorgen dat uw persoonsgegevens
in
overeenstemming met de toepasselijke wetgeving worden beschermd.
7. Rechten inzake gegevensbescherming
In het kader van de op u van toepassing zijnde wetgeving inzake gegevensbescherming en voor zover hierin is
voorzien,
kunt u om
inlichtingen over uw bij ons opgeslagen gegevens verzoeken
en heeft u het
recht
om uw gegevens in een gangbare, machineleesbare indeling te ontvangen
. Bovendien kunt u in
onderbouwde
gevallen verzoeken om
uw gegevens te wissen of te corrigeren
alsmede de verwerking ervan te
beperken respectievelijk
bezwaar te maken tegen de verwerking van uw gegevens
of uw
toestemming voor de verwerking te herroepen
. U hebt ook het
recht om een klacht in te
dienen bij de bevoegde toezichthoudende autoriteit
.
Houd er rekening mee dat wij ons het recht voorbehouden om de wettelijke beperkingen in te roepen, bijvoorbeeld
wanneer wij verplicht zijn om bepaalde gegevens te bewaren of te verwerken of wanneer wij daar een
doorslaggevend
belang bij hebben.
8. Contact opnemen
Verantwoordelijke instantie:
Verantwoordelijke voor de verwerking van de gegevens op de Website is Innovation 6 AG, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615
Wermatswil, Zwitserland.
Wanneer u vragen hebt over gegevensbescherming, kunt u een e-mail sturen naar
support@tommedications.com
of per post naar Innovation 6 AG,
Support, Pfäffikerstrasse 109, 8615 Wermatswil, Zwitserland.
Functionaris gegevensbescherming en EU-vertegenwoordigers:
Onze externe Functionaris gegevensbescherming en EU-vertegenwoordigers zijn bereikbaar op:
Pascal Winnen, Hemex Germany GmbH, Wallbrunstrasse 24, 79539 Lörrach, Duitsland.
E-mail:
pascal.winnen@hemex.ch
Unsere Website verwendet Cookies
Damit ist nicht das knusprige, leckere Gebäck gemeint. Diese Cookies helfen uns dabei, unsere Website sicherer und ansprechender für dich zu machen. Durch die Nutzung unserer Website und Dienstleistungen stimmst du der Verwendung von Cookies zu, welche in der
Datenschutzrichtlinie
ausführlicher beschrieben ist.
Akzeptieren
Weitere Informationen
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
http://www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/:
Privacy & Terms
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/privacy:

Sub-policy 2
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/:
Facebook
Email or phone
Password
Forgot account?
Create new account
It looks like you were misusing this feature by going too fast. You’ve been temporarily blocked from using it.
Back
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 3
https://privacycenter.instagram.com/policy/:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024
|
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Instagram on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Instagram, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Instagram on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Instagram, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies